  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 7.0.1

This is basically a cleanup release for 7.0.1

Migration to v7.0.1

A dump/restore is not required for those running 7.0.

Changes
-------
Fix many CLUSTER failures (Tom)
Allow ALTER TABLE RENAME works on indexes (Tom)
Fix plpgsql to handle datetime->timestamp and timespan->interval (Bruce)
New configure --with-setproctitle switch to use setproctitle() (Marc, Bruce)
Fix the off by one errors in ResultSet from 6.5.3, and more.
jdbc ResultSet fixes (Joseph Shraibman)
optimizer tunings (Tom)
Fix create user for pgaccess
Fix for UNLISTEN failure
IRIX fixes (David Kaelbling)
QNX fixes (Andreas Kardos)
Reduce COPY IN lock level (Tom)
Change libpqeasy to use PQconnectdb() style parameters (Bruce)
Fix pg_dump to handle OID indexes (Tom)
Fix small memory leak (Tom)
Solaris fix for createdb/dropdb (Tatsuo)
Fix for non-blocking connections (Alfred Perlstein)
Fix improper recovery after RENAME TABLE failures (Tom)
Copy pg_ident.conf.sample into /lib directory in install (Bruce)
Add SJIS UDC (NEC selection IBM kanji) support (Eiji Tokuya)
Fix too long syslog message (Tatsuo)
Fix problem with quoted indexes that are too long (Tom)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                               Release 7.0
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
          
Release 7.0

   This release shows the continued growth of PostgreSQL. There are more
   changes in 7.0 than in any previous release. Don't be concerned this
   is a dot-zero release. We do our best to put out only solid releases,
   and this one is no exception.
   
Major changes in this release:
   
   Foreign Keys
          Foreign keys are now implemented, with the exception of PARTIAL
          MATCH foreign keys. Many users have been asking for this
          feature, and we are pleased to offer it.
          
   Optimizer Overhaul
          Continuing on work started a year ago, the optimizer has been
          overhauled, allowing improved query execution and better
          performance with less memory usage.
          
   Updated psql
          psql, our interactive terminal monitor, has been updated with a
          variety of new features. See the psql manual page for details.
          
   Upcoming Features
          In 7.1 or 7.2, we plan to have outer joins, storage for very 
          long rows, and a write-ahead logging system.
          
Migration to v7.0

   A dump/restore using pg_dump is required for those wishing to migrate
   data from any previous release. For those upgrading from 6.5.*, you
   can use pg_upgrade to upgrade to this release.
   

Bug Fixes
---------
Prevent function calls with more than maximum number of arguments (Tom)
Improve CASE construct (Tom)
Fix SELECT coalesce(f1,0) FROM int4_tbl GROUP BY f1 (Tom)
Fix SELECT sentence.words[0] FROM sentence GROUP BY sentence.words[0] (Tom)
Fix GROUP BY scan bug (Tom)
Improvements in SQL grammar processing (Tom)
Fix for views involved in INSERT ... SELECT ... (Tom)
Fix for SELECT a/2, a/2 FROM test_missing_target GROUP BY a/2 (Tom)
Fix for subselects in INSERT ... SELECT (Tom)
Prevent INSERT ... SELECT ... ORDER BY (Tom)
Fixes for relations greater than 2GB, including vacuum
Improve communication of system table changes to other running backends (Tom)
Improve communication of user table modifications to other running backends (Tom)
Fix handling of temp tables in complex situations (Bruce, Tom)
Allow table locking when tables opened, improving concurrent reliability (Tom)
Properly quote sequence names in pg_dump (Ross J. Reedstrom)
Prevent DROP DATABASE while others accessing
Prevent any rows from being returned by GROUP BY if no rows processed (Tom)
Fix SELECT COUNT(1) FROM table WHERE ...' if no rows matching WHERE (Tom)
Fix pg_upgrade so it works for MVCC(Tom)
Fix for SELECT ... WHERE x IN (SELECT ... HAVING SUM(x) &gt; 1) (Tom)
Fix for "f1 datetime DEFAULT 'now'"  (Tom)
Fix problems with CURRENT_DATE used in DEFAULT (Tom)
Allow comment-only lines, and ;;; lines too. (Tom)
Improve recovery after failed disk writes, disk full (Hiroshi)
Fix cases where table is mentioned in FROM but not joined (Tom)
Allow HAVING clause without aggregate functions (Tom)
Fix for "--" comment and no trailing newline, as seen in Perl
Improve pg_dump failure  error reports (Bruce)
Allow sorts and hashes to exceed 2GB file sizes (Tom)
Fix for pg_dump dumping of inherited rules (Tom)
Fix for NULL handling comparisons (Tom)
Fix inconsistent state caused by failed CREATE/DROP commands (Hiroshi)
Fix for dbname with dash
Prevent DROP INDEX from interfering with other backends (Tom)
Fix file descriptor leak in verify_password()
Fix for "Unable to identify an operator =$" problem
Fix ODBC so no segfault if CommLog and Debug enabled (Dirk Niggemann)
Fix for recursive exit call (Massimo)
Fix for extra-long timezones (Jeroen van Vianen)
Make pg_dump preserve primary key information (Peter E)
Prevent databases with single quotes (Peter E)
Prevent DROP DATABASE inside  transaction (Peter E)
ecpg memory leak fixes (Stephen Birch)
Fix for SELECT null::text, SELECT int4fac(null) and SELECT 2 + (null) (Tom)
Y2K timestamp fix (Massimo)
Fix for VACUUM 'HEAP_MOVED_IN was not expected' errors (Tom)
Fix for views with tables/columns containing spaces  (Tom)
Prevent permissions on indexes (Peter E)
Fix for spinlock stuck problem when error is generated (Hiroshi)
Fix ipcclean on Linux
Fix handling of NULL constraint conditions (Tom)
Fix memory leak in odbc driver (Nick Gorham)
Fix for permission check on UNION tables (Tom)
Fix to allow SELECT 'a' LIKE 'a' (Tom)
Fix for SELECT 1 + NULL (Tom)
Fixes to CHAR
Fix log() on numeric type (Tom)
Deprecate ':' and ';' operators
Allow vacuum of temporary tables
Disallow inherited columns with the same name as new columns
Recover or force failure when disk space is exhausted(Hiroshi)
Fix INSERT INTO ... SELECT with AS columns matching result columns
Fix INSERT ... SELECT ... GROUP BY groups by target columns not source columns(Tom)
Fix CREATE TABLE test (a char(5) DEFAULT text '', b int4) with INSERT(Tom)
Fix UNION with LIMIT
Fix CREATE TABLE x AS SELECT 1 UNION SELECT 2
Fix CREATE TABLE test(col char(2) DEFAULT user)
Fix mismatched types in CREATE TABLE ... DEFAULT
Fix SELECT * FROM pg_class where oid in (0,-1)
Fix SELECT COUNT('asdf') FROM pg_class WHERE oid=12
Prevent user who can create databases can modifying pg_database table(Peter E)
Fix btree to give a useful elog when key > 1/2 (page - overhead)(Tom)
Fix INSERT of 0.0 into DECIMAL(4,4) field(Tom)

Enhancements
------------
New CLI interface include file sqlcli.h, based on SQL3/SQL98
Remove all limits on query length, row length limit still exists (Tom)
Update jdbc protocol to 2.0 (<ulink url="mailto:jens@jens.de">Jens Glaser</ulink>)
Add TRUNCATE command to quickly truncate relation (Mike Mascari)
Fix to give super user and createdb user proper update catalog rights (Peter E)
Allow ecpg bool variables to have NULL values (Christof)
Issue ecpg error if NULL value is returned to variable with no NULL
indicator (Christof)
Allow ^C to cancel COPY command (Massimo)
Add SET FSYNC and SHOW PG_OPTIONS commands(Massimo)
Function name overloading for dynamically-loaded C functions (Frankpitt)
Add CmdTuples() to libpq++(Vince)
New CREATE CONSTRAINT TRIGGER and SET CONSTRAINTS commands(Jan)
Allow CREATE FUNCTION/WITH clause to be used for all language types
configure --enable-debug adds -g (Peter E)
configure --disable-debug removes -g (Peter E)
Allow more complex default expressions (Tom)
First real FOREIGN KEY constraint trigger functionality (Jan)
Add FOREIGN KEY ... MATCH FULL ... ON DELETE CASCADE (Jan)
Add FOREIGN KEY ... MATCH &lt;unspecified&gt; referential actions (Don Baccus)
Allow WHERE restriction on ctid (physical heap location) (Hiroshi)
Move pginterface from contrib to interface directory, rename to pgeasy (Bruce)
Change pgeasy connectdb() parameter ordering (Bruce)
Add DEC and SESSION_USER as reserved words (Thomas)
Require SELECT DISTINCT target list to have all ORDER BY columns (Tom)
Add Oracle's COMMENT ON command (<ulink url="mailto:mascarim@yahoo">Mike Mascari</ulink>)
libpq's PQsetNoticeProcessor function now returns previous hook(Peter E)
Prevent PQsetNoticeProcessor from being set to NULL (Peter E)
Make USING in COPY optional (Bruce)
Allow subselects in the target list (Tom)
Allow subselects on the left side of comparison operators (Tom)
New parallel regression test (Jan)
Change backend-side COPY to write files with permissions 644 not 666 (Tom)
Force permissions on PGDATA directory to be secure, even if it exists (Tom)
Added psql LASTOID variable to return last inserted oid (Peter E)
Allow concurrent vacuum and remove pg_vlock vacuum lock file (Tom)
Add permissions check so only Postgres superuser or table owner can
vacuum (Peter E)
New libpq functions to allow asynchronous connections: PQconnectStart(), 
   PQconnectPoll(), PQresetStart(), PQresetPoll(), PQsetenvStart(), 
   PQsetenvPoll(), PQsetenvAbort (Ewan Mellor)
New libpq PQsetenv() function (Ewan Mellor)
create/alter user extension (Peter E)
New postmaster.pid and postmaster.opts under $PGDATA (Tatsuo)
New scripts for create/drop user/db (Peter E)
Major psql overhaul(Peter E)
Add const to libpq interface(Peter E)
New libpq function PQoidValue (Peter E)
Show specific non-aggregate causing problem with GROUP BY (Tom)
Make changes to pg_shadow recreate pg_pwd file (Peter E)
Add aggregate(DISTINCT ...) (Tom)
Allow flag to control COPY input/output of NULLs (Peter E)
Make postgres user have a password by default (Peter E)
Add CREATE/ALTER/DROP GROUP (Peter E)
All administration scripts now support --long options (Peter E, Karel)
Vacuumdb script now supports --all option (Peter E)
ecpg new portable FETCH syntax
Add ecpg EXEC SQL IFDEF, EXEC SQL IFNDEF, EXEC SQL ELSE, EXEC SQL ELIF 
	and EXEC SQL ENDIF directives
Add pg_ctl script to control backend startup (Tatsuo)
Add postmaster.opts.default file to store startup flags (Tatsuo)
Allow --with-mb=SQL_ASCII
Increase maximum number of index keys to 16 (Bruce)
Increase maximum number of function arguments to 16 (Bruce)
Allow configuration of maximum number of index keys and arguments (Bruce)
Allow unprivileged users to change their passwords (Peter E)
Password authentication enabled; required for new users (Peter E)
Disallow dropping a user who owns a database (Peter E)
Change initdb option --with-mb to --enable-multibyte
Add option for initdb to prompts for superuser password (Peter E)
Allow complex type casts like col::numeric(9,2) and col::int2::float8 (Tom)
Updated user interfaces on initdb, initlocation, pg_dump, ipcclean (Peter E)
New pg_char_to_encoding() and pg_encoding_to_char() functions (Tatsuo)
Libpq non-blocking mode (Alfred Perlstein)
Improve conversion of types in casts that don't specify a length
New plperl internal programming language (Mark Hollomon)
Allow COPY IN to read file that do not end with a newline (Tom)
Indicate when long identifiers are truncated (Tom)
Allow aggregates to use type equivalency (Peter E)
Add Oracle's to_char(), to_date(), to_datetime(), to_timestamp(), to_number()
	conversion functions (Karel Zak &lt;zakkr@zf.jcu.cz&gt;)
Add SELECT DISTINCT ON (expr [, expr ...]) targetlist ... (Tom)
Check to be sure ORDER BY is compatible with the DISTINCT operation (Tom)
Add NUMERIC and int8 types to ODBC
Improve EXPLAIN results for Append, Group, Agg, Unique (Tom)
Add ALTER TABLE ... ADD FOREIGN KEY (Stephan Szabo)
Allow SELECT .. FOR UPDATE in PL/pgSQL (Hiroshi)
Enable backward sequential scan even after reaching EOF (Hiroshi)
Add btree indexing of boolean values, &gt;= and &lt;= (Don Baccus)
Print current line number when COPY FROM fails (Massimo)
Recognize special case of POSIX time zone: "GMT+8" and "GMT-8" (Thomas)
Add DEC as synonym for "DECIMAL" (Thomas)
Add SESSION_USER as SQL92 keyword, same as CURRENT_USER (Thomas)
Implement column aliases (aka correlation names) and join syntax (Thomas)
Allow queries like SELECT a FROM t1 tx (a) (Thomas)
Allow queries like SELECT * FROM t1 NATURAL JOIN t2 (Thomas)
Make INTERVAL reserved word allowed as a column identifier (Thomas)
Implement REINDEX command (Hiroshi)
Accept ALL in aggregate function SUM(ALL col) (Tom)
Prevent GROUP BY from using column aliases (Tom)
New psql \encoding option (Tatsuo)
Allow PQrequestCancel() to terminate when in waiting-for-lock state (Hiroshi)
Allow negation of a negative number in all cases
Add ecpg descriptors (Christof, Michael)
Allow CREATE VIEW v AS SELECT f1::char(8) FROM tbl
Allow casts with length, like foo::char(8)
New libpq functions PQsetClientEncoding(), PQclientEncoding() (Tatsuo)
Add support for SJIS user defined characters (Tatsuo)
Larger views/rules supported
Make libpq's PQconndefaults() thread-safe (Tom)
Disable // as comment to be ANSI conforming, should use -- (Tom)
Allow column aliases on views CREATE VIEW name (collist)
Fixes for views with subqueries (Tom)
Allow UPDATE table SET fld = (SELECT ...) (Tom)
SET command options no longer require quotes
Update pgaccess to 0.98.6
New SET SEED command
New pg_options.sample file
New SET FSYNC command (Massimo)
Allow pg_descriptions when creating tables
Allow pg_descriptions when creating types, columns, and functions
Allow psql \copy to allow delimiters(Peter E)
Allow psql to print nulls as distinct from "" [null](Peter E)

Types
-----
Many array fixes (Tom)
Allow bare column names to be subscripted as arrays (Tom)
Improve type casting of int and float constants (Tom)
Cleanups for int8 inputs, range checking, and type conversion (Tom)
Fix for SELECT timespan('21:11:26'::time) (Tom)
Fix for netmask('x.x.x.x/0') is 255.255.255.255 instead of 0.0.0.0 
	(Oleg Sharoiko)
Add btree index on NUMERIC(Jan)
Perl fix for large objects containing NUL characters (Douglas Thomson) 
ODBC fix for for large objects (free)
Fix indexing of cidr data type
Fix for Ethernet MAC addresses (macaddr type) comparisons
Fix for date/time types when overflows happened in computations (Tom)
Allow array on int8 (Peter E)
Fix for rounding/overflow of NUMERIC type, like NUMERIC(4,4) (Tom)
Allow NUMERIC arrays
Fix bugs in NUMERIC ceil() and floor() functions (Tom)
Make char_length()/octet_length including trailing blanks (Tom)
Made abstime/reltime use int4 instead of time_t (Peter E)
New lztext data type for compressed text fields
Revise code to handle coercion of int and float constants (Tom)
New C-routines to implement a BIT and BIT VARYING type in /contrib 
	(Adriaan Joubert)
NUMERIC now accepts scientific notation (Tom)
NUMERIC to int4 rounds (Tom)
Convert float4/8 to NUMERIC properly (Tom)
Allow type conversion with NUMERIC (Thomas)
Make ISO date style (2000-02-16 09:33) the default (Thomas)
Add NATIONAL CHAR [ VARYING ]
Allow NUMERIC round and trunc to accept negative scales (Tom)
New TIME WITH TIME ZONE type (Thomas)
Add MAX()/MIN() on time type (Thomas)
Add abs(), mod(), fac() for int8 (Thomas)
Add round(), sqrt(), cbrt(), pow()
Rename NUMERIC power() to pow()
Improved TRANSLATE() function
Allow X=-Y operators  (Tom)
Add exp() and ln() as NUMERIC types
Allow SELECT float8(COUNT(*)) / (SELECT COUNT(*) FROM int4_tbl) FROM int4_tbl
	GROUP BY f1; (Tom)
Allow LOCALE to use indexes in regular expression searches(Tom)
Allow creation of functional indexes to use default types

Performance
-----------
Prevent exponential space consumption with many AND's and OR's (Tom)
Collect attribute selectivity values for system columns (Tom)
Reduce memory usage of aggregates (Tom)
Fix for LIKE optimization to use indexes with multi-byte encodings (Tom)
Fix r-tree index optimizer selectivity (Thomas)
Improve optimizer selectivity computations and functions (Tom)
Optimize btree searching for cases where many equal keys exist (Tom)
Enable fast LIKE index processing only if index present (Tom)
Re-use free space on index pages with duplicates (Tom)
Improve hash join processing (Tom)
Prevent descending sort if result is already sorted(Hiroshi)
Allow commuting of index scan query qualifications (Tom)
Prefer index scans in cases where ORDER BY/GROUP BY is required (Tom)
Allocate large memory requests in fix-sized chunks for performance (Tom)
Fix vacuum's performance by reducing memory allocation requests (Tom)
Implement constant-expression simplification (Bernard Frankpitt, Tom)
Allow more than first column to be used to determine start of index scan
   (Hiroshi)
Prevent quadruple use of disk space when doing internal sorting (Tom)
Faster sorting by calling fewer functions (Tom)
Create system indexes to match all system caches (Bruce, Hiroshi)
Make system caches use system indexes(Bruce)
Make all system indexes unique(Bruce)
Improve pg_statistics management for VACUUM speed improvement (Tom)
Flush backend cache less frequently (Tom, Hiroshi)
COPY now reuses previous memory allocation, improving performance (Tom)
Improve optimization cost estimation (Tom)
Improve optimizer estimate of range queries x &gt; lowbound AND x &lt; highbound (Tom)
Use DNF instead of CNF where appropriate (Tom, Taral)
Further cleanup for OR-of-AND WHERE-clauses (Tom)
Make use of index in OR clauses (x = 1 AND y = 2) OR (x = 2 AND y = 4) (Tom)
Smarter optimizer computations for random index page access (Tom)
New SET variable to control optimizer costs (Tom)
Optimizer queries based on LIMIT, OFFSET, and EXISTS qualifications (Tom)
Reduce optimizer internal housekeeping of join paths for speedup (Tom)
Major subquery speedup (Tom)
Fewer fsync writes when fsync is not disabled(Tom)
Improved LIKE optimizer estimates(Tom)
Prevent fsync in SELECT-only queries(Vadim)
Make index creation use psort code, because it is now faster(Tom)
Allow creation of sort temp tables > 1 Gig

Source Tree Changes
-------------------
Fix for linux PPC compile
New generic expression-tree-walker subroutine (Tom)
Change form() to varargform() to prevent portability problems.
Improved range checking for large integers on Alphas
Clean up #include in /include directory (Bruce)
Add scripts for checking includes (Bruce)
Remove un-needed #include's from *.c files (Bruce)
Change #include's to use &lt;&gt; and "" as appropriate (Bruce)
Enable WIN32 compilation of libpq
Alpha spinlock fix from <ulink url="mailto:gatgul@voicenet.com">Uncle George</ulink>
Overhaul of optimizer data structures (Tom)
Fix to cygipc library (Yutaka Tanida)
Allow pgsql to work on newer Cygwin snapshots(Dan)
New catalog version number (Tom)
Add Linux ARM.
Rename heap_replace to heap_update
Update for QNX (Dr. Andreas Kardos)
New platform-specific regression handling (Tom)
Rename oid8 -&gt; oidvector and int28 -&gt; int2vector (Bruce)
Included all yacc and lex files into the distribution (Peter E.)
Remove lextest, no longer needed (Peter E)
Fix for libpq and psql on Win32 (Magnus)
Internally change datetime and timespan into timestamp and interval (Thomas)
Fix for plpgsql on BSDI
Add SQL_ASCII test case to the regression test (Tatsuo)
configure --with-mb now deprecated (Tatsuo)
NT fixes
NetBSD fixes <ulink url="mailto:lamj@stat.cmu.edu">Johnny C. Lam</ulink>
Fixes for Alpha compiles
New multibyte encodings


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                               Release 6.5.3
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.5.3

This is basically a cleanup release for 6.5.2. We have added a new pgaccess
that was missing in 6.5.2, and installed an NT-specific fix.

Migration to v6.5.3

A dump/restore is not required for those running 6.5.*.

Changes
-------
Updated version of pgaccess 0.98
NT-specific patch


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                               Release 6.5.2
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.5.2

This is basically a cleanup release for 6.5.1. We have fixed a variety of
problems reported by 6.5.1 users.

Migration to v6.5.2

A dump/restore is not required for those running 6.5.*.

Changes
-------
subselect+CASE fixes(Tom)
Add SHLIB_LINK setting for solaris_i386 and solaris_sparc ports(Daren Sefcik)
Fixes for CASE in WHERE join clauses(Tom)
Fix BTScan abort(Tom)
Repair the check for redundant UNIQUE and PRIMARY KEY indices(Thomas)
Improve it so that it checks for multi-column constraints(Thomas)
Fix for Win32 making problem with MB enabled(Hiroki Kataoka)
Allow BSD yacc and bison to compile pl code(Bruce)
Fix SET NAMES working
int8 fixes(Thomas)
Fix vacuum's memory consumption(Hiroshi,Tatsuo)
Reduce the total memory consumption of vacuum(Tom)
Fix for timestamp(datetime)
Rule deparsing bugfixes(Tom)
Fix quoting problems in mkMakefile.tcldefs.sh.in and mkMakefile.tkdefs.sh.in(Tom)
This is to re-use space on index pages freed by vacuum(Vadim)
document -x for pg_dump(Bruce)
Fix for unary operators in rule deparser(Tom)
Comment out FileUnlink of excess segments during mdtruncate()(Tom)
Irix linking fix from Yu Cao yucao@falcon.kla-tencor.com
Repair logic error in LIKE: should not return LIKE_ABORT
   when reach end of pattern before end of text(Tom)
Repair incorrect cleanup of heap memory allocation during transaction abort(Tom)
Updated version of pgaccess 0.98


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release Notes                                                  Release 6.5.1
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.5.1

This is basically a cleanup release for 6.5. We have fixed a variety of
problems reported by 6.5 users.

Migration to v6.5.1

A dump/restore is not required for those running 6.5.

Changes
-------
Add NT README file
Portability fixes for linux_ppc, Irix, linux_alpha, OpenBSD, alpha
Remove QUERY_LIMIT, use SELECT...LIMIT
Fix for EXPLAIN on inheritance(Tom)
Patch to allow vacuum on multi-segment tables(Hiroshi)
R-Tree optimizer selectivity fix(Tom)
ACL file descriptor leak fix(Atsushi Ogawa)
New expresssion subtree code(Tom)
Avoid disk writes for read-only transactions(Vadim)
Fix for removal of temp tables if last transaction was aborted(Bruce)
Fix to prevent too large tuple from being created(Bruce)
plpgsql fixes
Allow port numbers 32k - 64k(Bruce)
Add ^ precidence(Bruce)
Rename sort files called pg_temp to pg_sorttemp(Bruce)
Fix for microseconds in time values(Tom)
Tutorial source cleanup
New linux_m68k port
Fix for sorting of NULL's in some cases(Tom)
Shared library dependencies fixed (Tom)
Fixed glitches affecting GROUP BY in subselects(Tom)
Fix some compiler warnings (Tomoaki Nishiyama)
Add Win1250 (Czech) support (Pavel Behal)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.5.2                                                    Release 6.5
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.5

This release marks a major step in the development team's mastery of the
source code we inherited from Berkeley. You will see we are now easily
adding major features, thanks to the increasing size and experience of our
world-wide development team.

Here is a brief summary of the more notable changes:

Multi-version concurrency control(MVCC)

     This removes our old table-level locking, and replaces it with a
     locking system that is superior to most commercial database systems. In
     a traditional system, each row that is modified is locked until
     committed, preventing reads by other users. MVCC uses the natural
     multi-version nature of PostgreSQL to allow readers to continue reading
     consistent data during writer activity. Writers continue to use the
     compact pg_log transaction system. This is all performed without having
     to allocate a lock for every row like traditional database systems. So,
     basically, we no longer are restricted by simple table-level locking;
     we have something better than row-level locking.

Hot backups from pg_dump

     pg_dump takes advantage of the new MVCC features to give a consistant
     database dump/backup while the database stays online and available for
     queries.

Numeric data type

     We now have a true numeric data type, with user-specified precision.

Temporary tables

     Temporary tables are guaranteed to have unique names within a database
     session, and are destroyed on session exit.

New SQL features

     We now have CASE, INTERSECT, and EXCEPT statement support. We have new
     LIMIT/OFFSET, SET TRANSACTION ISOLATION LEVEL, SELECT ... FOR UPDATE,
     and an improved LOCK TABLE command.

Speedups

     We continue to speed up PostgreSQL, thanks to the variety of talents
     within our team. We have sped up memory allocation, optimization, table
     joins, and row transfer routines.

Ports

     We continue to expand our port list, this time including WinNT/ix86 and
     NetBSD/arm32.

Interfaces

     Most interfaces have new versions, and existing functionality has been
     improved.

Documentation

     New and updated material is present throughout the documentation. New
     FAQs have been contributed for SGI and AIX platforms. The Tutorial has
     introductory information on SQL from Stefan Simkovics. For the User's
     Guide, there are reference pages covering the postmaster and more
     utility programs, and a new appendix contains details on date/time
     behavior. The Administrator's Guide has a new chapter on
     troubleshooting from Tom Lane. And the Programmer's Guide has a
     description of query processing, also from Stefan, and details on
     obtaining the Postgres source tree via anonymous CVS and CVSup.

Migration to v6.5

A dump/restore using pg_dump is required for those wishing to migrate data
from any previous release of Postgres. pg_upgrade can not be used to upgrade
to this release because the on-disk structure of the tables has changed
compared to previous releases.

The new Multi-Version Concurrency Control (MVCC) features can give somewhat
different behaviors in multi-user environments. Read and understand the
following section to ensure that your existing applications will give you
the behavior you need.

Multi-Version Concurrency Control

Because readers in 6.5 don't lock data, regardless of transaction isolation
level, data read by one transaction can be overwritten by another. In other
words, if a row is returned by SELECT it doesn't mean that this row really
exists at the time it is returned (i.e. sometime after the statement or
transaction began) nor that the row is protected from being deleted or
updated by concurrent transactions before the current transaction does a
commit or rollback.

To ensure the actual existence of a row and protect it against concurrent
updates one must use SELECT FOR UPDATE or an appropriate LOCK TABLE
statement. This should be taken into account when porting applications from
previous releases of Postgres and other environments.

Keep the above in mind if you are using contrib/refint.* triggers for
referential integrity. Additional technics are required now. One way is to
use LOCK parent_table IN SHARE ROW EXCLUSIVE MODE command if a transaction
is going to update/delete a primary key and use LOCK parent_table IN SHARE
MODE command if a transaction is going to update/insert a foreign key.

     Note: Note that if you run a transaction in SERIALIZABLE mode then
     you must execute the LOCK commands above before execution of any
     DML statement (SELECT/INSERT/DELETE/UPDATE/FETCH/COPY_TO) in the
     transaction.

These inconveniences will disappear in the future when the ability to read
dirty (uncommitted) data (regardless of isolation level) and true
referential integrity will be implemented.


Bug Fixes
---------
Fix text<->float8 and text<->float4 conversion functions(Thomas)
Fix for creating tables with mixed-case constraints(Billy)
Change exp()/pow() behavior to generate error on underflow/overflow(Jan)
Fix bug in pg_dump -z
Memory overrun cleanups(Tatsuo)
Fix for lo_import crash(Tatsuo)
Adjust handling of data type names to suppress double quotes(Thomas)
Use type coersion for matching columns and DEFAULT(Thomas)
Fix deadlock so it only checks once after one second of sleep(Bruce)
Fixes for aggregates and PL/pgsql(Hiroshi)
Fix for subquery crash(Vadim)
Fix for libpq function PQfnumber and case-insensitive names(Bahman Rafatjoo)
Fix for large object write-in-middle, no extra block, memory consumption(Tatsuo)
Fix for pg_dump -d or -D and  quote special characters in INSERT
Repair serious problems with dynahash(Tom)
Fix INET/CIDR portability problems
Fix problem with selectivity error in ALTER TABLE ADD COLUMN(Bruce)
Fix executor so mergejoin of different column types works(Tom)
Fix for Alpha OR selectivity bug
Fix OR index selectivity problem(Bruce)
Fix so \d shows proper length for char()/varchar()(Ryan)
Fix tutorial code(Clark)
Improve destroyuser checking(Oliver)
Fix for Kerberos(Rodney McDuff)
Fix for dropping database while dirty buffers(Bruce)
Fix so sequence nextval() can be case-sensitive(Bruce)
Fix !!= operator
Drop buffers before destroying database files(Bruce)
Fix case where executor evaluates functions twice(Tatsuo)
Allow sequence nextval actions to be case-sensitive(Bruce)
Fix optimizer indexing not working for negative numbers(Bruce)
Fix for memory leak in executor with fjIsNull
Fix for aggregate memory leaks(Erik Riedel)
Allow username containing a dash GRANT permissions
Cleanup of NULL in inet types
Clean up system table bugs(Tom)
Fix problems of PAGER and \? command(Masaaki Sakaida)
Reduce default multi-segment file size limit to 1GB(Peter)
Fix for dumping of CREATE OPERATOR(Tom)
Fix for backward scanning of cursors(Hiroshi Inoue)
Fix for COPY FROM STDIN when using \i(Tom)
Fix for subselect is compared inside an expression(Jan)
Fix handling of error reporting while returning rows(Tom)
Fix problems with reference to array types(Tom,Jan)
Prevent UPDATE SET oid(Jan)
Fix pg_dump so -t option can handle case-sensitive tablenames
Fixes for GROUP BY in special cases(Tom, Jan)
Fix for memory leak in failed queries(Tom)
DEFAULT now supports mixed-case identifiers(Tom)
Fix for multi-segment uses of DROP/RENAME table, indexes(Ole Gjerde)
Disable use of pg_dump with both -o and -d options(Bruce)
Allow pg_dump to properly dump GROUP permissions(Bruce)
Fix GROUP BY in INSERT INTO table SELECT * FROM table2(Jan)
Fix for computations in views(Jan)
Fix for aggregates on array indexes(Tom)
Fix for DEFAULT handles single quotes in value requiring too many quotes
Fix security problem with non-super users importing/exporting large objects(Tom)
Rollback of transaction that creates table cleaned up properly(Tom)
Fix to allow long table and column names to generate proper serial names(Tom)

Enhancements
------------
Add "vacuumdb" utility
Speed up libpq by allocating memory better(Tom)
EXPLAIN all indices used(Tom)
Implement CASE, COALESCE, NULLIF  expression(Thomas)
New pg_dump table output format(Constantin)
Add string min()/max() functions(Thomas)
Extend new type coersion techniques to aggregates(Thomas)
New moddatetime contrib(Terry)
Update to pgaccess 0.96(Constantin)
Add routines for single-byte "char" type(Thomas)
Improved substr() function(Thomas)
Improved multi-byte handling(Tatsuo)
Multi-version concurrency control/MVCC(Vadim)
New Serialized mode(Vadim)
Fix for tables over 2gigs(Peter)
New SET TRANSACTION ISOLATION LEVEL(Vadim)
New LOCK TABLE IN ... MODE(Vadim)
Update ODBC driver(Byron)
New NUMERIC data type(Jan)
New SELECT FOR UPDATE(Vadim)
Handle "NaN" and "Infinity" for input values(Jan)
Improved date/year handling(Thomas)
Improved handling of backend connections(Magnus)
New options ELOG_TIMESTAMPS and USE_SYSLOG options for log files(Massimo)
New TCL_ARRAYS option(Massimo)
New INTERSECT and EXCEPT(Stefan)
New pg_index.indisprimary for primary key tracking(D'Arcy)
New pg_dump option to allow dropping of tables before creation(Brook)
Speedup of row output routines(Tom)
New READ COMMITTED isolation level(Vadim)
New TEMP tables/indexes(Bruce)
Prevent sorting if result is already sorted(Jan)
New memory allocation optimization(Jan)
Allow psql to do \p\g(Bruce)
Allow multiple rule actions(Jan)
Added LIMIT/OFFSET functionality(Jan)
Improve optimizer when joining a large number of tables(Bruce)
New intro to SQL from S. Simkovics' Master's Thesis (Stefan, Thomas)
New intro to backend processing from S. Simkovics' Master's Thesis (Stefan)
Improved int8 support(Ryan Bradetich, Thomas, Tom)
New routines to convert between int8 and text/varchar types(Thomas)
New bushy plans, where meta-tables are joined(Bruce)
Enable right-hand queries by default(Bruce)
Allow reliable maximum number of backends to be set at configure time
      (--with-maxbackends and postmaster switch (-N backends))(Tom)
GEQO default now 10 tables because of optimizer speedups(Tom)
Allow NULL=Var for MS-SQL portability(Michael, Bruce)
Modify contrib check_primary_key() so either "automatic" or "dependent"(Anand)
Allow psql \d on a view show query(Ryan)
Speedup for LIKE(Bruce)
Ecpg fixes/features, see src/interfaces/ecpg/ChangeLog file(Michael)
JDBC fixes/features, see src/interfaces/jdbc/CHANGELOG(Peter)
Make % operator have precedence like /(Bruce)
Add new postgres -O option to allow system table structure changes(Bruce)
Update contrib/pginterface/findoidjoins script(Tom)
Major speedup in vacuum of deleted rows with indexes(Vadim)
Allow non-SQL functions to run different versions based on arguments(Tom)
Add -E option that shows actual queries sent by \dt and friends(Masaaki Sakaida)
Add version number in startup banners for psql(Masaaki Sakaida)
New contrib/vacuumlo removes large objects not referenced(Peter)
New initialization for table sizes so non-vacuumed tables perform better(Tom)
Improve error messages when a connection is rejected(Tom)
Support for arrays of char() and varchar() fields(Massimo)
Overhaul of hash code to increase reliability and performance(Tom)
Update to PyGreSQL 2.4(D'Arcy)
Changed debug options so -d4 and -d5 produce different node displays(Jan)
New pg_options: pretty_plan, pretty_parse, pretty_rewritten(Jan)
Better optimization statistics for system table access(Tom)
Better handling of non-default block sizes(Massimo)
Improve GEQO optimizer memory consumption(Tom)
UNION now suppports ORDER BY of columns not in target list(Jan)
Major libpq++ improvements(Vince Vielhaber)
pg_dump now uses -z(ACL's) as default(Bruce)
backend cache, memory speedups(Tom)
have pg_dump do everything in one snapshot transaction(Vadim)
fix for large object memory leakage, fix for pg_dumping(Tom)
INET type now respects netmask for comparisons
Make VACUUM ANALYZE only use a readlock(Vadim)
Allow VIEWs on UNIONS(Jan)
pg_dump now can generate consistent snapshots on active databases(Vadim)

Source Tree Changes
-------------------
Improve port matching(Tom)
Portability fixes for SunOS
Add NT/Win32 backend port and enable dynamic loading(Magnus and Daniel Horak)
New port to Cobalt Qube(Mips) running Linux(Tatsuo)
Port to NetBSD/m68k(Mr. Mutsuki Nakajima)
Port to NetBSD/sun3(Mr. Mutsuki Nakajima)
Port to NetBSD/macppc(Toshimi Aoki)
Fix for tcl/tk configuration(Vince)
Removed CURRENT keyword for rule queries(Jan)
NT dynamic loading now works(Daniel Horak)
Add ARM32 support(Andrew McMurry)
Better support for HPUX 11 and Unixware
Improve file handling to be more uniform, prevent file descriptor leak(Tom)
New install commands for plpgsql(Jan)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.5.1                                                  Release 6.4.2
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.4.2

The 6.4.1 release was improperly packaged. This also has one additional bug
fix.

Migration to v6.4.2

A dump/restore is not required for those running 6.4.*.

Changes
-------
Fix for datetime constant problem on some platforms(Thomas)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.5                                                    Release 6.4.1
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.4.1

This is basically a cleanup release for 6.4. We have fixed a variety of
problems reported by 6.4 users.

Migration to v6.4.1

A dump/restore is not required for those running 6.4.

Changes
-------
Add pg_dump -N flag to force double quotes around identifiers.  This is
        the default(Thomas)
Fix for NOT in where clause causing crash(Bruce)
EXPLAIN VERBOSE coredump fix(Vadim)
Fix shared-library problems on Linux
Fix test for table existance to allow mixed-case and whitespace in
        the table name(Thomas)
Fix a couple of pg_dump bugs
Configure matches template/.similar entries better(Tom)
Change builtin function names from SPI_* to spi_*
OR WHERE clause fix(Vadim)
Fixes for mixed-case table names(Billy)
contrib/linux/postgres.init.csh/sh fix(Thomas)
libpq memory overrun fix
SunOS fixes(Tom)
Change exp() behavior to generate error on underflow(Thomas)
pg_dump fixes for memory leak, inheritance constraints, layout change
update pgaccess to 0.93
Fix prototype for 64-bit platforms
Multi-byte fixes(Tatsuo)
New ecpg man page
Fix memory overruns(Tatsuo)
Fix for lo_import() crash(Bruce)
Better search for install program(Tom)
Timezone fixes(Tom)
HPUX fixes(Tom)
Use implicit type coersion for matching DEFAULT values(Thomas)
Add routines to help with single-byte (internal) character type(Thomas)
Compilation of libpq for Win32 fixes(Magnus)
Upgrade to PyGreSQL 2.2(D'Arcy)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.4.2                                                    Release 6.4
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.4

There are many new features and improvements in this release. Thanks to our
developers and maintainers, nearly every aspect of the system has received
some attention since the previous release. Here is a brief, incomplete
summary:

   * Views and rules are now functional thanks to extensive new code in the
     rewrite rules system from Jan Wieck. He also wrote a chapter on it for
     the Programmer's Guide.

   * Jan also contributed a second procedural language, PL/pgSQL, to go with
     the original PL/pgTCL procedural language he contributed last release.

   * We have optional multiple-byte character set support from Tatsuo Iishi
     to complement our existing locale support.

   * Client/server communications has been cleaned up, with better support
     for asynchronous messages and interrupts thanks to Tom Lane.

   * The parser will now perform automatic type coersion to match arguments
     to available operators and functions, and to match columns and
     expressions with target columns. This uses a generic mechanism which
     supports the type extensibility features of Postgres. There is a new
     chapter in the User's Guide which covers this topic.

   * Three new data types have been added. Two types, inet and cidr, support
     various forms of IP network, subnet, and machine addressing. There is
     now an 8-byte integer type available on some platforms. See the chapter
     on data types in the User's Guide for details. A fourth type, serial,
     is now supported by the parser as an amalgam of the int4 type, a
     sequence, and a unique index.

   * Several more SQL92-compatible syntax features have been added,
     including INSERT DEFAULT VALUES

   * The automatic configuration and installation system has received some
     attention, and should be more robust for more platforms than it has
     ever been.

Migration to v6.4

A dump/restore using pg_dump or pg_dumpall is required for those wishing to
migrate data from any previous release of Postgres.


Bug Fixes
---------
Fix for a tiny memory leak in PQsetdb/PQfinish(Bryan)
Remove char2-16 data types, use char/varchar(Darren)
Pqfn not handles a NOTICE message(Anders)
Reduced busywaiting overhead for spinlocks with many backends (dg)
Stuck spinlock detection (dg)
Fix up "ISO-style" timespan decoding and encoding(Thomas)
Fix problem with table drop after rollback of transaction(Vadim)
Change error message and remove non-functional update message(Vadim)
Fix for COPY array checking
Fix for SELECT 1 UNION SELECT NULL
Fix for buffer leaks in large object calls(Pascal)
Change owner from oid to int4 type(Bruce)
Fix a bug in the oracle compatibility functions btrim() ltrim() and rtrim()
Fix for shared invalidation cache overflow(Massimo)
Prevent file descriptor leaks in failed COPY's(Bruce)
Fix memory leak in libpgtcl's pg_select(Constantin)
Fix problems with username/passwords over 8 characters(Tom)
Fix problems with handling of asynchronous NOTIFY in backend(Tom)
Fix of many bad system table entries(Tom)

Enhancements
------------
Upgrade ecpg and ecpglib,see src/interfaces/ecpc/ChangeLog(Michael)
Show the index used in an EXPLAIN(Zeugswetter)
EXPLAIN  invokes  rule system and shows plan(s) for rewritten queries(Jan)
Multi-byte awareness of many data types and functions, via configure(Tatsuo)
New configure --with-mb option(Tatsuo)
New initdb --pgencoding option(Tatsuo)
New createdb -E multibyte option(Tatsuo)
Select version(); now returns PostgreSQL version(Jeroen)
Libpq now allows asynchronous clients(Tom)
Allow cancel from client of backend query(Tom)
Psql now cancels query with Control-C(Tom)
Libpq users need not issue dummy queries to get NOTIFY messages(Tom)
NOTIFY now sends sender's PID, so you can tell whether it was your own(Tom)
PGresult struct now includes associated error message, if any(Tom)
Define "tz_hour" and "tz_minute" arguments to date_part()(Thomas)
Add routines to convert between varchar and bpchar(Thomas)
Add routines to allow sizing of varchar and bpchar into target columns(Thomas)
Add bit flags to support timezonehour and minute in data retrieval(Thomas)
Allow more variations on valid floating point numbers (e.g. ".1", "1e6")(Thomas)
Fixes for unary minus parsing with leading spaces(Thomas)
Implement TIMEZONE_HOUR, TIMEZONE_MINUTE per SQL92 specs(Thomas)
Check for and properly ignore FOREIGN KEY column constraints(Thomas)
Define USER as synonym for CURRENT_USER per SQL92 specs(Thomas)
Enable HAVING clause but no fixes elsewhere yet.
Make "char" type a synonym for "char(1)" (actually implemented as bpchar)(Thomas)
Save string type if specified for DEFAULT clause handling(Thomas)
Coerce operations involving different data types(Thomas)
Allow some index use for columns of different types(Thomas)
Add capabilities for automatic type conversion(Thomas)
Cleanups for large objects, so file is truncated on open(Peter)
Readline cleanups(Tom)
Allow psql  \f \ to make spaces as delimiter(Bruce)
Pass pg_attribute.atttypmod to the frontend for column field lengths(Tom,Bruce)
Msql compatibility library in /contrib(Aldrin)
Remove the requirement that ORDER/GROUP BY clause identifiers be
included in the target list(David)
Convert columns to match columns in UNION clauses(Thomas)
Remove fork()/exec() and only do fork()(Bruce)
Jdbc cleanups(Peter)
Show backend status on ps command line(only works on some platforms)(Bruce)
Pg_hba.conf now has a sameuser option in the database field
Make lo_unlink take oid param, not int4
New DISABLE_COMPLEX_MACRO for compilers that can't handle our macros(Bruce)
Libpgtcl now handles NOTIFY as a Tcl event, need not send dummy queries(Tom)
libpgtcl cleanups(Tom)
Add -error option to libpgtcl's pg_result command(Tom)
New locale patch, see docs/README/locale(Oleg)
Fix for pg_dump so CONSTRAINT and CHECK syntax is correct(ccb)
New contrib/lo code for large object orphan removal(Peter)
New psql command "SET CLIENT_ENCODING TO 'encoding'" for multi-bytes
feature, see /doc/README.mb(Tatsuo)
/contrib/noupdate code to revoke update permission on a column
Libpq can now be compiled on win32(Magnus)
Add PQsetdbLogin() in libpq
New 8-byte integer type, checked by configure for OS support(Thomas)
Better support for quoted table/column names(Thomas)
Surround table and column names with double-quotes in pg_dump(Thomas)
PQreset() now works with passwords(Tom)
Handle case of GROUP BY target list column number out of range(David)
Allow UNION in subselects
Add auto-size to screen to \d? commands(Bruce)
Use UNION to show all \d? results in one query(Bruce)
Add \d? field search feature(Bruce)
Pg_dump issues fewer \connect requests(Tom)
Make pg_dump -z flag work better, document it in manual page(Tom)
Add HAVING clause with full support for subselects and unions(Stephan)
Full text indexing routines in contrib/fulltextindex(Maarten)
Transaction ids now stored in shared memory(Vadim)
New PGCLIENTENCODING when issuing COPY command(Tatsuo)
Support for SQL92 syntax "SET NAMES"(Tatsuo)
Support for LATIN2-5(Tatsuo)
Add UNICODE regression test case(Tatsuo)
Lock manager cleanup, new locking modes for LLL(Vadim)
Allow index use with OR clauses(Bruce)
Allows "SELECT NULL ORDER BY 1;"
Explain VERBOSE prints the plan, and now pretty-prints the plan to
the postmaster log file(Bruce)
Add Indices display to \d command(Bruce)
Allow GROUP BY on functions(David)
New pg_class.relkind for large objects(Bruce)
New way to send libpq NOTICE messages to a different location(Tom)
New \w write command to psql(Bruce)
New /contrib/findoidjoins scans oid columns to find join relationships(Bruce)
Allow binary-compatible indices to be considered when checking for valid
indices for restriction clauses containing a constant(Thomas)
New ISBN/ISSN code in /contrib/isbn_issn
Allow NOT LIKE, IN, NOT IN, BETWEEN, and NOT BETWEEN constraint(Thomas)
New rewrite system fixes many problems with rules and views(Jan)
        * Rules on relations work
        * Event qualifications on insert/update/delete work
        * New OLD variable to reference CURRENT, CURRENT will be remove in future
        * Update rules can reference NEW and OLD in rule qualifications/actions
        * Insert/update/delete rules on views work
        * Multiple rule actions are now supported, surrounded by parentheses
        * Regular users can create views/rules on tables they have RULE permits
        * Rules and views inherit the permissions on the creator
        * No rules at the column level
        * No UPDATE NEW/OLD rules
        * New pg_tables, pg_indexes, pg_rules and pg_views system views
        * Only a single action on SELECT rules
        * Total rewrite overhaul, perhaps for 6.5
        * handle subselects
        * handle aggregates on views
        * handle insert into select from view works
System indexes are now multi-key(Bruce)
Oidint2, oidint4, and oidname types are removed(Bruce)
Use system cache for more system table lookups(Bruce)
New backend programming language PL/pgSQL in backend/pl(Jan)
New SERIAL data type, auto-creates sequence/index(Thomas)
Enable assert checking without a recompile(Massimo)
User lock enhancements(Massimo)
New setval() command to set sequence value(Massimo)
Auto-remove unix socket file on startup if no postmaster running(Massimo)
Conditional trace package(Massimo)
New UNLISTEN command(Massimo)
Psql and libpq now compile under win32 using win32.mak(Magnus)
Lo_read no longer stores trailing NULL(Bruce)
Identifiers are now truncated to 31 characters internally(Bruce)
Createuser options now availble on the command line
Code for 64-bit integer supported added, configure tested, int8 type(Thomas)
Prevent file descriptor leaf from failed COPY(Bruce)
New pg_upgrade command(Bruce)
Updated /contrib directories(Massimo)
New CREATE TABLE DEFAULT VALUES statement available(Thomas)
New INSERT INTO TABLE DEFAULT VALUES statement available(Thomas)
New DECLARE and FETCH feature(Thomas)
libpq's internal structures now not exported(Tom)
Allow up to 8 key indexes(Bruce)
Remove ARCHIVE keyword, that is no longer used(Thomas)
pg_dump -n flag to supress quotes around indentifiers
disable system columns for views(Jan)
new INET and CIDR types for network addresses(TomH, Paul)
no more double quotes in psql output
pg_dump now dumps views(Terry)
new SET QUERY_LIMIT(Tatsuo,Jan)

Source Tree Changes
-------------------
/contrib cleanup(Jun)
Inline some small functions called for every row(Bruce)
Alpha/linux fixes
Hp/UX cleanups(Tom)
Multi-byte regression tests(Soonmyung.)
Remove --disabled options from configure
Define PGDOC to use POSTGRESDIR by default
Make regression optional
Remove extra braces code to pgindent(Bruce)
Add bsdi shared library support(Bruce)
New --without-CXX support configure option(Brook)
New FAQ_CVS
Update backend flowchart in tools/backend(Bruce)
Change atttypmod from int16 to int32(Bruce, Tom)
Getrusage() fix for platforms that do not have it(Tom)
Add PQconnectdb, PGUSER, PGPASSWORD to libpq man page
NS32K platform fixes(Phil Nelson, John Buller)
Sco 7/UnixWare 2.x fixes(Billy,others)
Sparc/Solaris 2.5 fixes(Ryan)
Pgbuiltin.3 is obsolete, move to doc files(Thomas)
Even more documention(Thomas)
Nextstep support(Jacek)
Aix support(David)
pginterface manual page(Bruce)
shared libraries all have version numbers
merged all OS-specific shared library defines into one file
smarter TCL/TK configuration checking(Billy)
smarter perl configuration(Brook)
configure uses supplied install-sh if no install script found(Tom)
new Makefile.shlib for shared library configuration(Tom)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.4.1                                                  Release 6.3.2
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.3.2

This is a bugfix release for 6.3.x. Refer to the release notes for v6.3 for
a more complete summary of new features.

Summary:

   * Repairs automatic configuration support for some platforms, including
     Linux, from breakage inadvertently introduced in v6.3.1.

   * Correctly handles function calls on the left side of BETWEEN and LIKE
     clauses.

A dump/restore is NOT required for those running 6.3 or 6.3.1. A 'make
distclean', 'make', and 'make install' is all that is required. This last
step should be performed while the postmaster is not running. You should
re-link any custom applications that use Postgres libraries.

For upgrades from pre-v6.3 installations, refer to the installation and
migration instructions for v6.3.


Changes
-------
Configure detection improvements for tcl/tk(Brook Milligan, Alvin)
Manual page improvements(Bruce)
BETWEEN and LIKE fix(Thomas)
fix for psql \connect used by pg_dump(Oliver Elphick)
New odbc driver
pgaccess, version 0.86
qsort removed, now uses libc version, cleanups(Jeroen)
fix for buffer over-runs detected(Maurice Gittens)
fix for buffer overrun in libpgtcl(Randy Kunkee)
fix for UNION with DISTINCT or ORDER BY(Bruce)
gettimeofday configure check(Doug Winterburn)
Fix "indexes not used" bug(Vadim)
docs additions(Thomas)
Fix for backend memory leak(Bruce)
libreadline cleanup(Erwan MAS)
Remove DISTDIR(Bruce)
Makefile dependency cleanup(Jeroen van Vianen)
ASSERT fixes(Bruce)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.4                                                    Release 6.3.1
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.3.1

Summary:

   * Additional support for multi-byte character sets.

   * Repair byte ordering for mixed-endian clients and servers.

   * Minor updates to allowed SQL syntax.

   * Improvements to the configuration autodetection for installation.

A dump/restore is NOT required for those running 6.3. A 'make distclean',
'make', and 'make install' is all that is required. This last step should be
performed while the postmaster is not running. You should re-link any custom
applications that use Postgres libraries.

For upgrades from pre-v6.3 installations, refer to the installation and
migration instructions for v6.3.


Changes
-------
ecpg cleanup/fixes, now version 1.1(Michael Meskes)
pg_user cleanup(Bruce)
large object fix for pg_dump and tclsh (alvin)
LIKE fix for multiple adjacent underscores
fix for redefining builtin functions(Thomas)
ultrix4 cleanup
upgrade to pg_access 0.83
updated CLUSTER manual page
multi-byte character set support, see doc/README.mb(Tatsuo)
configure --with-pgport fix
pg_ident fix
big-endian fix for backend communications(Kataoka)
SUBSTR() and substring() fix(Jan)
several jdbc fixes(Peter)
libpgtcl improvements, see libptcl/README(Randy Kunkee)
Fix for "Datasize = 0" error(Vadim)
Prevent \do from wrapping(Bruce)
Remove duplicate Russian character set entries
Sunos4 cleanup
Allow optional TABLE keyword in LOCK and SELECT INTO(Thomas)
CREATE SEQUENCE options to allow a negative integer(Thomas)
Add "PASSWORD" as an allowed column identifier(Thomas)
Add checks for UNION target fields(Bruce)
Fix Alpha port(Dwayne Bailey)
Fix for text arrays containing quotes(Doug Gibson)
Solaris compile fix(Albert Chin-A-Young)
Better identify tcl and tk libs and includes(Bruce)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.3.2                                                    Release 6.3
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.3

There are many new features and improvements in this release. Here is a
brief, incomplete summary:

   * Many new SQL features, including full SQL92 subselect capability
     (everything is here but target-list subselects).

   * Support for client-side environment variables to specify time zone and
     date style.

   * Socket interface for client/server connection. This is the default now
     so you may need to start postmaster with the "-i" flag.

   * Better password authorization mechanisms. Default table permissions
     have changed.

   * Old-style "time travel" has been removed. Performance has been
     improved.

     Note: Bruce Momjian wrote the following notes to introduce the new
     release.

There are some general 6.3 issues that I want to mention. These are only the
big items that can not be described in one sentence. A review of the
detailed changes list is still needed.

First, we now have subselects. Now that we have them, I would like to
mention that without subselects, SQL is a very limited language. Subselects
are a major feature, and you should review your code for places where
subselects provide a better solution for your queries. I think you will find
that there are more uses for subselects than you may think. Vadim has put us
on the big SQL map with subselects, and fully functional ones too. The only
thing you can't do with subselects is to use them in the target list.

Second, 6.3 uses unix domain sockets rather than TCP/IP by default. To
enable connections from other machines, you have to use the new postmaster
-i option, and of course edit pg_hba.conf. Also, for this reason, the format
of pg_hba.conf has changed.

Third, char() fields will now allow faster access than varchar() or text.
Specifically, the text and varchar() have a penalty for access to any
columns after the first column of this type. char() used to also have this
access penalty, but it no longer does. This may suggest that you redesign
some of your tables, especially if you have short character columns that you
have defined as varchar() or text. This and other changes make 6.3 even
faster than earlier releases.

We now have passwords definable independent of any Unix file. There are new
SQL USER commands. See the pg_hba.conf manual page for more information.
There is a new table, pg_shadow, which is used to store user information and
user passwords, and it by default only SELECT-able by the postgres
super-user. pg_user is now a view of pg_shadow, and is SELECT-able by
PUBLIC. You should keep using pg_user in your application without changes.

User-created tables now no longer have SELECT permission to PUBLIC by
default. This was done because the ANSI standard requires it. You can of
course GRANT any permissions you want after the table is created. System
tables continue to be SELECT-able by PUBLIC.

We also have real deadlock detection code. No more sixty-second timeouts.
And the new locking code implements a FIFO better, so there should be less
resource starvation during heavy use.

Many complaints have been made about inadequate documenation in previous
releases. Thomas has put much effort into many new manuals for this release.
Check out the doc/ directory.

For performance reasons, time travel is gone, but can be implemented using
triggers (see pgsql/contrib/spi/README). Please check out the new \d command
for types, operators, etc. Also, views have their own permissions now, not
based on the underlying tables, so permissions on them have to be set
separately. Check /pgsql/interfaces for some new ways to talk to Postgres.

This is the first release that really required an explanation for existing
users. In many ways, this was necessary because the new release removes many
limitations, and the work-arounds people were using are no longer needed.

Migration to v6.3

A dump/restore using pg_dump or pg_dumpall is required for those wishing to
migrate data from any previous release of Postgres.


Bug Fixes
---------
Fix binary cursors broken by MOVE implementation(Vadim)
Fix for tcl library crash(Jan)
Fix for array handling, from Gerhard Hintermayer
Fix acl error, and remove duplicate pqtrace(Bruce)
Fix psql \e for empty file(Bruce)
Fix for textcat on varchar() fields(Bruce)
Fix for DBT Sendproc (Zeugswetter Andres)
Fix vacuum analyze syntax problem(Bruce)
Fix for international identifiers(Tatsuo)
Fix aggregates on inherited tables(Bruce)
Fix substr() for out-of-bounds data
Fix for select 1=1 or 2=2, select 1=1 and 2=2, and select sum(2+2)(Bruce)
Fix notty output to show status result.  -q option still turns it off(Bruce)
Fix for count(*), aggs with views and multiple tables and sum(3)(Bruce)
Fix cluster(Bruce)
Fix for PQtrace start/stop several times(Bruce)
Fix a variety of locking problems like newer lock waiters getting
        lock before older waiters, and having readlock people not share
        locks if a writer is waiting for a lock, and waiting writers not
        getting priority over waiting readers(Bruce)
Fix crashes in psql when executing queries from external files(James)
Fix problem with multiple order by columns, with the first one having
        NULL values(Jeroen)
Use correct hash table support functions for float8 and int4(Thomas)
Re-enable JOIN= option in CREATE OPERATOR statement (Thomas)
Change precedence for boolean operators to match expected behavior(Thomas)
Generate elog(ERROR) on over-large integer(Bruce)
Allow multiple-argument functions in constraint clauses(Thomas)
Check boolean input literals for 'true','false','yes','no','1','0'
        and throw elog(ERROR) if unrecognized(Thomas)
Major large objects fix
Fix for GROUP BY showing duplicates(Vadim)
Fix for index scans in MergeJion(Vadim)

Enhancements
------------
Subselects with EXISTS, IN, ALL, ANY keywords (Vadim, Bruce, Thomas)
New User Manual(Thomas, others)
Speedup by inlining some frequently-called functions
Real deadlock detection, no more timeouts(Bruce)
Add SQL92 "constants" CURRENT_DATE, CURRENT_TIME, CURRENT_TIMESTAMP,
        CURRENT_USER(Thomas)
Modify constraint syntax to be SQL92-compliant(Thomas)
Implement SQL92 PRIMARY KEY and UNIQUE clauses using indices(Thomas)
Recognize SQL92 syntax for FOREIGN KEY. Throw elog notice(Thomas)
Allow NOT NULL UNIQUE constraint clause (each allowed separately before)(Thomas)
Allow Postgres-style casting ("::") of non-constants(Thomas)
Add support for SQL3 TRUE and FALSE boolean constants(Thomas)
Support SQL92 syntax for IS TRUE/IS FALSE/IS NOT TRUE/IS NOT FALSE(Thomas)
Allow shorter strings for boolean literals (e.g. "t", "tr", "tru")(Thomas)
Allow SQL92 delimited identifiers(Thomas)
Implement SQL92 binary and hexadecimal string decoding (b'10' and x'1F')(Thomas)
Support SQL92 syntax for type coercion of literal strings
        (e.g. "DATETIME 'now'")(Thomas)
Add conversions for int2, int4, and OID types to and from text(Thomas)
Use shared lock when building indices(Vadim)
Free memory allocated for an user query inside transaction block after
        this query is done, was turned off in <= 6.2.1(Vadim)
New SQL statement CREATE PROCEDURAL LANGUAGE(Jan)
New Postgres Procedural Language (PL) backend interface(Jan)
Rename pg_dump -H option to -h(Bruce)
Add Java support for passwords, European dates(Peter)
Use indices for LIKE and ~, !~ operations(Bruce)
Add hash functions for datetime and timespan(Thomas)
Time Travel removed(Vadim, Bruce)
Add paging for \d and \z, and fix \i(Bruce)
Add Unix domain socket support to backend and to frontend library(Goran)
Implement CREATE DATABASE/WITH LOCATION and initlocation utility(Thomas)
Allow more SQL92 and/or Postgres reserved words as column identifiers(Thomas)
Augment support for SQL92 SET TIME ZONE...(Thomas)
SET/SHOW/RESET TIME ZONE uses TZ backend environment variable(Thomas)
Implement SET keyword = DEFAULT and SET TIME ZONE DEFAULT(Thomas)
Enable SET TIME ZONE using TZ environment variable(Thomas)
Add PGDATESTYLE environment variable to frontend and backend initialization(Thomas)
Add PGTZ, PGCOSTHEAP, PGCOSTINDEX, PGRPLANS, PGGEQO
        frontend library initialization environment variables(Thomas)
Regression tests time zone automatically set with "setenv PGTZ PST8PDT"(Thomas)
Add pg_description table for info on tables, columns, operators, types, and
        aggregates(Bruce)
Increase 16 char limit on system table/index names to 32 characters(Bruce)
Rename system indices(Bruce)
Add 'GERMAN' option to SET DATESTYLE(Thomas)
Define an "ISO-style" timespan output format with "hh:mm:ss" fields(Thomas)
Allow fractional values for delta times (e.g. '2.5 days')(Thomas)
Validate numeric input more carefully for delta times(Thomas)
Implement day of year as possible input to date_part()(Thomas)
Define timespan_finite() and text_timespan() functions(Thomas)
Remove archive stuff(Bruce)
Allow for a pg_password authentication database that is separate from
        the system password file(Todd)
Dump ACLs, GRANT, REVOKE permissions(Matt)
Define text, varchar, and bpchar string length functions(Thomas)
Fix Query handling for inheritance, and cost computations(Bruce)
Implement CREATE TABLE/AS SELECT (alternative to SELECT/INTO)(Thomas)
Allow NOT, IS NULL, IS NOT NULL in constraints(Thomas)
Implement UNIONs for SELECT(Bruce)
Add UNION, GROUP, DISTINCT to INSERT(Bruce)
varchar() stores only necessary bytes on disk(Bruce)
Fix for BLOBs(Peter)
Mega-Patch for JDBC...see README_6.3 for list of changes(Peter)
Remove unused "option" from PQconnectdb()
New LOCK command and lock manual page describing deadlocks(Bruce)
Add new psql \da, \dd, \df, \do, \dS, and \dT commands(Bruce)
Enhance psql \z to show sequences(Bruce)
Show NOT NULL and DEFAULT in psql \d table(Bruce)
New psql .psqlrc file startup(Andrew)
Modify sample startup script in contrib/linux to show syslog(Thomas)
New types for IP and MAC addresses in contrib/ip_and_mac(TomH)
Unix system time conversions with date/time types in contrib/unixdate(Thomas)
Update of contrib stuff(Massimo)
Add Unix socket support to DBD::Pg(Goran)
New python interface (PyGreSQL 2.0)(D'Arcy)
New frontend/backend protocol has a version number, network byte order(Phil)
Security features in pg_hba.conf enhanced and documented, many cleanups(Phil)
CHAR() now faster access than VARCHAR() or TEXT
ecpg embedded SQL preprocessor
Reduce system column overhead(Vadmin)
Remove pg_time table(Vadim)
Add pg_type attribute to identify types that need length (bpchar, varchar)
Add report of offending line when COPY command fails
Allow VIEW permissions to be set separately from the underlying tables.
        For security, use GRANT/REVOKE on views as appropriate(Jan)
Tables now have no default GRANT SELECT TO PUBLIC.  You must
        explicitly grant such permissions.
Clean up tutorial examples(Darren)

Source Tree Changes
-------------------
Add new html development tools, and flow chart in /tools/backend
Fix for SCO compiles
Stratus computer port Robert Gillies
Added support for shlib for BSD44_derived & i386_solaris
Make configure more automated(Brook)
Add script to check regression test results
Break parser functions into smaller files, group together(Bruce)
Rename heap_create to heap_create_and_catalog, rename heap_creatr
        to heap_create()(Bruce)
Sparc/Linux patch for locking(TomS)
Remove PORTNAME and reorganize port-specific stuff(Marc)
Add optimizer README file(Bruce)
Remove some recursion in optimizer and clean up some code there(Bruce)
Fix for NetBSD locking(Henry)
Fix for libptcl make(Tatsuo)
AIX patch(Darren)
Change IS TRUE, IS FALSE, ... to expressions using "=" rather than
        function calls to istrue() or isfalse() to allow optimization(Thomas)
Various fixes NetBSD/Sparc related(TomH)
Alpha linux locking(Travis,Ryan)
Change elog(WARN) to elog(ERROR)(Bruce)
FAQ for FreeBSD(Marc)
Bring in the PostODBC source tree as part of our standard distribution(Marc)
A minor patch for HP/UX 10 vs 9(Stan)
New pg_attribute.atttypmod for type-specific info like varchar length(Bruce)
Unixware patches(Billy)
New i386 'lock' for spin lock asm(Billy)
Support for multiplexed backends is removed
Start an OpenBSD port
Start an AUX port
Start a Cygnus port
Add string functions to regression suite(Thomas)
Expand a few function names formerly truncated to 16 characters(Thomas)
Remove un-needed malloc() calls and replace with palloc()(Bruce)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.3.1                                                  Release 6.2.1
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.2.1

v6.2.1 is a bug-fix and usability release on v6.2.

Summary:

   * Allow strings to span lines, per SQL92.

   * Include example trigger function for inserting user names on table
     updates.

This is a minor bug-fix release on v6.2. For upgrades from pre-v6.2 systems,
a full dump/reload is required. Refer to the v6.2 release notes for
instructions.

Migration from v6.2 to v6.2.1

This is a minor bug-fix release. A dump/reload is not required from v6.2,
but is required from any release prior to v6.2.

In upgrading from v6.2, if you choose to dump/reload you will find that
avg(money) is now calculated correctly. All other bug fixes take effect upon
updating the executables.

Another way to avoid dump/reload is to use the following SQL command from
psql to update the existing system table:

  update pg_aggregate set aggfinalfn = 'cash_div_flt8'
   where aggname = 'avg' and aggbasetype = 790;

This will need to be done to every existing database, including template1.


Changes
-------
Allow TIME and TYPE column names(Thomas)
Allow larger range of true/false as boolean values(Thomas)
Support output of "now" and "current"(Thomas)
Handle DEFAULT with INSERT of NULL properly(Vadim)
Fix for relation reference counts problem in buffer manager(Vadim)
Allow strings to span lines, like ANSI(Thomas)
Fix for backward cursor with ORDER BY(Vadim)
Fix avg(cash) computation(Thomas)
Fix for specifying a column twice in ORDER/GROUP BY(Vadim)
Documented new libpq function to return affected rows, PQcmdTuples(Bruce)
Trigger function for inserting user names for INSERT/UPDATE(Brook Milligan)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.3                                                      Release 6.2
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.2

A dump/restore is required for those wishing to migrate data from previous
releases of Postgres.

Migration from v6.1 to v6.2

This migration requires a complete dump of the 6.1 database and a restore of
the database in 6.2.

Note that the pg_dump and pg_dumpall utility from 6.2 should be used to dump
the 6.1 database.

Migration from v1.x to v6.2

Those migrating from earlier 1.* releases should first upgrade to 1.09
because the COPY output format was improved from the 1.02 release.


Bug Fixes
---------
Fix problems with pg_dump for inheritance, sequences, archive tables(Bruce)
Fix compile errors on overflow due to shifts, unsigned, and bad prototypes
         from Solaris(Diab Jerius)
Fix bugs in geometric line arithmetic (bad intersection calculations)(Thomas)
Check for geometric intersections at endpoints to avoid rounding ugliness(Thomas)
Catch non-functional delete attempts(Vadim)
Change time function names to be more consistent(Michael Reifenberg)
Check for zero divides(Michael Reifenberg)
Fix very old bug which made tuples changed/inserted by a commnd
        visible to the command itself (so we had multiple update of
        updated tuples, etc)(Vadim)
Fix for SELECT null, 'fail' FROM pg_am (Patrick)
SELECT NULL as EMPTY_FIELD now allowed(Patrick)
Remove un-needed signal stuff from contrib/pginterface
Fix OR (where x != 1 or x isnull didn't return tuples with x NULL) (Vadim)
Fix time_cmp function (Vadim)
Fix handling of functions with non-attribute first argument in
        WHERE clauses (Vadim)
Fix GROUP BY when order of entries is different from order
        in target list (Vadim)
Fix pg_dump for aggregates without sfunc1 (Vadim)

Enhancements
------------
Default genetic optimizer GEQO parameter is now 8(Bruce)
Allow use parameters in target list having aggregates in functions(Vadim)
Added JDBC driver as an interface(Adrian & Peter)
pg_password utility
Return number of tuples inserted/affected by INSERT/UPDATE/DELETE etc.(Vadim)
Triggers implemented with CREATE TRIGGER (SQL3)(Vadim)
SPI (Server Programming Interface) allows execution of queries inside
        C-functions (Vadim)
NOT NULL implemented (SQL92)(Robson Paniago de Miranda)
Include reserved words for string handling, outer joins, and unions(Thomas)
Implement extended comments ("/* ... */") using exclusive states(Thomas)
Add "//" single-line comments(Bruce)
Remove some restrictions on characters in operator names(Thomas)
DEFAULT and CONSTRAINT for tables implemented (SQL92)(Vadim & Thomas)
Add text concatenation operator and function (SQL92)(Thomas)
Support WITH TIME ZONE syntax (SQL92)(Thomas)
Support INTERVAL unit TO unit syntax (SQL92)(Thomas)
Define types DOUBLE PRECISION, INTERVAL, CHARACTER,
        and CHARACTER VARYING (SQL92)(Thomas)
Define type FLOAT(p) and rudimentary DECIMAL(p,s), NUMERIC(p,s) (SQL92)(Thomas)
Define EXTRACT(), POSITION(), SUBSTRING(), and TRIM() (SQL92)(Thomas)
Define CURRENT_DATE, CURRENT_TIME, CURRENT_TIMESTAMP (SQL92)(Thomas)
Add syntax and warnings for UNION, HAVING, INNER and OUTER JOIN (SQL92)(Thomas)
Add more reserved words, mostly for SQL92 compliance(Thomas)
Allow hh:mm:ss time entry for timespan/reltime types(Thomas)
Add center() routines for lseg, path, polygon(Thomas)
Add distance() routines for circle-polygon, polygon-polygon(Thomas)
Check explicitly for points and polygons contained within polygons
        using an axis-crossing algorithm(Thomas)
Add routine to convert circle-box(Thomas)
Merge conflicting operators for different geometric data types(Thomas)
Replace distance operator "<===>" with "<->"(Thomas)
Replace "above" operator "!^" with ">^" and "below" operator "!|" with "<^"(Thomas)
Add routines for text trimming on both ends, substring, and string position(Thomas)
Added conversion routines circle(box) and poly(circle)(Thomas)
Allow internal sorts to be stored in memory rather than in files(Bruce & Vadim)
Allow functions and operators on internally-identical types to succeed(Bruce)
Speed up backend startup after profiling analysis(Bruce)
Inline frequently called functions for performance(Bruce)
Reduce open() calls(Bruce)
psql:  Add PAGER for \h and \?,\C fix
Fix for psql pager when no tty(Bruce)
New entab utility(Bruce)
General trigger functions for referential integrity (Vadim)
General trigger functions for time travel (Vadim)
General trigger functions for AUTOINCREMENT/IDENTITY feature (Vadim)
MOVE implementation (Vadim)

Source Tree Changes
-------------------
HPUX 10 patches (Vladimir Turin)
Added SCO support, (Daniel Harris)
mkLinux patches (Tatsuo Ishii)
Change geometric box terminology from "length" to "width"(Thomas)
Deprecate temporary unstored slope fields in geometric code(Thomas)
Remove restart instructions from INSTALL(Bruce)
Look in /usr/ucb first for install(Bruce)
Fix c++ copy example code(Thomas)
Add -o to psql manual page(Bruce)
Prevent relname unallocated string length from being copied into database(Bruce)
Cleanup for NAMEDATALEN use(Bruce)
Fix pg_proc names over 15 chars in output(Bruce)
Add strNcpy() function(Bruce)
remove some (void) casts that are unnecessary(Bruce)
new interfaces directory(Marc)
Replace fopen() calls with calls to fd.c functions(Bruce)
Make functions static where possible(Bruce)
enclose unused functions in #ifdef NOT_USED(Bruce)
Remove call to difftime() in timestamp support to fix SunOS(Bruce & Thomas)
Changes for Digital Unix
Portability fix for pg_dumpall(Bruce)
Rename pg_attribute.attnvals to attdisbursion(Bruce)
"intro/unix" manual page now "pgintro"(Bruce)
"built-in" manual page now "pgbuiltin"(Bruce)
"drop" manual page now "drop_table"(Bruce)
Add "create_trigger", "drop_trigger" manual pages(Thomas)
Add constraints regression test(Vadim & Thomas)
Add comments syntax regression test(Thomas)
Add PGINDENT and support program(Bruce)
Massive commit to run PGINDENT on all *.c and *.h files(Bruce)
Files moved to /src/tools directory(Bruce)
SPI and Trigger programming guides (Vadim & D'Arcy)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release 6.2.1                                                  Release 6.1.1
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.1.1

Migration from v6.1 to v6.1.1

This is a minor bug-fix release. A dump/reload is not required from v6.1,
but is required from any release prior to v6.1. Refer to the release notes
for v6.1 for more details.


Changes
-------
fix for SET with options (Thomas)
allow pg_dump/pg_dumpall to preserve ownership of all tables/objects(Bruce)
new psql \connect option allows changing usernames without changing databases
fix for initdb --debug option(Yoshihiko Ichikawa))
lextest cleanup(Bruce)
hash fixes(Vadim)
fix date/time month boundary arithmetic(Thomas)
fix timezone daylight handling for some ports(Thomas, Bruce, Tatsuo)
timestamp overhauled to use standard functions(Thomas)
other code cleanup in date/time routines(Thomas)
psql's \d now case-insensitive(Bruce)
psql's backslash commands can now have trailing semicolon(Bruce)
fix memory leak in psql when using \g(Bruce)
major fix for endian handling of communication to server(Thomas, Tatsuo)
Fix for Solaris assembler and include files(Yoshihiko Ichikawa)
allow underscores in usernames(Bruce)
pg_dumpall now returns proper status, portability fix(Bruce)


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                 Release 6.1
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release 6.1

The regression tests have been adapted and extensively modified for the v6.1
release of Postgres.

Three new data types (datetime, timespan, and circle) have been added to the
native set of Postgres types. Points, boxes, paths, and polygons have had
their output formats made consistant across the data types. The polygon
output in misc.out has only been spot-checked for correctness relative to
the original regression output.

Postgres v6.1 introduces a new, alternate optimizer which uses genetic
algorithms. These algorithms introduce a random behavior in the ordering of
query results when the query contains multiple qualifiers or multiple tables
(giving the optimizer a choice on order of evaluation). Several regression
tests have been modified to explicitly order the results, and hence are
insensitive to optimizer choices. A few regression tests are for data types
which are inherently unordered (e.g. points and time intervals) and tests
involving those types are explicitly bracketed with set geqo to 'off' and
reset geqo.

The interpretation of array specifiers (the curly braces around atomic
values) appears to have changed sometime after the original regression tests
were generated. The current ./expected/*.out files reflect this new
interpretation, which may not be correct!

The float8 regression test fails on at least some platforms. This is due to
differences in implementations of pow() and exp() and the signaling
mechanisms used for overflow and underflow conditions.

The "random" results in the random test should cause the "random" test to be
"failed", since the regression tests are evaluated using a simple diff.
However, "random" does not seem to produce random results on my test machine
(Linux/gcc/i686).

Migration to v6.1

This migration requires a complete dump of the 6.0 database and a restore of
the database in 6.1.

Those migrating from earlier 1.* releases should first upgrade to 1.09
because the COPY output format was improved from the 1.02 release.


Bug Fixes
---------
packet length checking in library routines
lock manager priority patch
check for under/over flow of float8(Bruce)
multi-table join fix(Vadim)
SIGPIPE crash fix(Darren)
large object fixes(Sven)
allow btree indexes to handle NULLs(Vadim)
timezone fixes(D'Arcy)
select SUM(x) can return NULL on no rows(Thomas)
internal optimizer, executor bug fixes(Vadim)
fix problem where inner loop in < or <= has no rows(Vadim)
prevent re-commuting join index clauses(Vadim)
fix join clauses for multiple tables(Vadim)
fix hash, hashjoin for arrays(Vadim)
fix btree for abstime type(Vadim)
large object fixes(Raymond)
fix buffer leak in hash indices (Vadim)
fix rtree for use in inner scan (Vadim)
fix gist for use in inner scan, cleanups (Vadim, Andrea)
avoid unnecessary local buffers allocation (Vadim, Massimo)
fix local buffers leak in transaction aborts (Vadim)
fix file manager memmory leaks, cleanups (Vadim, Massimo)
fix storage manager memmory leaks (Vadim)
fix btree duplicates handling (Vadim)
fix deleted tuples re-incarnation caused by vacuum (Vadim)
fix SELECT varchar()/char() INTO TABLE made zero-length fields(Bruce)
many psql, pg_dump, and libpq memory leaks fixed using Purify (Igor)

Enhancements
------------
attribute optimization statistics(Bruce)
much faster new btree bulk load code(Paul)
BTREE UNIQUE added to bulk load code(Vadim)
new lock debug code(Massimo)
massive changes to libpg++(Leo)
new GEQO optimizer speeds table multi-table optimization(Martin)
new WARN message for non-unique insert into unique key(Marc)
update x=-3, no spaces, now valid(Bruce)
remove case-sensitive identifier handling(Bruce,Thomas,Dan)
debug backend now pretty-prints tree(Darren)
new Oracle character functions(Edmund)
new plaintext password functions(Dan)
no such class or insufficient privilege changed to distinct messages(Dan)
new ANSI timestamp function(Dan)
new ANSI Time and Date types (Thomas)
move large chunks of data in backend(Martin)
multi-column btree indexes(Vadim)
new SET var TO value command(Martin)
update transaction status on reads(Dan)
new locale settings for character types(Oleg)
new SEQUENCE serial number generator(Vadim)
GROUP BY function now possible(Vadim)
re-organize regression test(Thomas,Marc)
new optimizer operation weights(Vadim)
new psql \z grant/permit option(Marc)
new MONEY data type(D'Arcy,Thomas)
tcp socket communication speed improved(Vadim)
new VACUUM option for attribute statistics, and for certain columns (Vadim)
many geometric type improvements(Thomas,Keith)
additional regression tests(Thomas)
new datestyle variable(Thomas,Vadim,Martin)
more comparison operators for sorting types(Thomas)
new conversion functions(Thomas)
new more compact btree format(Vadim)
allow pg_dumpall to preserve database ownership(Bruce)
new SET GEQO=# and R_PLANS variable(Vadim)
old (!GEQO) optimizer can use right-sided plans (Vadim)
typechecking improvement in SQL parser(Bruce)
new SET, SHOW, RESET commands(Thomas,Vadim)
new \connect database USER option
new destroydb -i option (Igor)
new \dt and \di psql commands (Darren)
SELECT "\n" now escapes newline (A. Duursma)
new geometry conversion functions from old format (Thomas)

Source tree changes
-------------------
new configuration script(Marc)
readline configuration option added(Marc)
OS-specific configuration options removed(Marc)
new OS-specific template files(Marc)
no more need to edit Makefile.global(Marc)
re-arrange include files(Marc)
nextstep patches (Gregor Hoffleit)
removed WIN32-specific code(Bruce)
removed postmaster -e option, now only postgres -e option (Bruce)
merge duplicate library code in front/backends(Martin)
now works with eBones, international Kerberos(Jun)
more shared library support
c++ include file cleanup(Bruce)
warn about buggy flex(Bruce)
DG-UX, Ultrix, Irix, AIX portability fixes


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                Release v6.0
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release v6.0

A dump/restore is required for those wishing to migrate data from previous
releases of Postgres.

Migration from v1.09 to v6.0

This migration requires a complete dump of the 1.09 database and a restore
of the database in 6.0.

Migration from pre-v1.09 to v6.0

Those migrating from earlier 1.* releases should first upgrade to 1.09
because the COPY output format was improved from the 1.02 release.


Bug Fixes
---------
ALTER TABLE bug - running postgress process needs to re-read table definition
Allow vacuum to be run on one table or entire database(Bruce)
Array fixes
Fix array over-runs of memory writes(Kurt)
Fix elusive btree range/non-range bug(Dan)
Fix for hash indexes on some types like time and date
Fix for pg_log size explosion
Fix permissions on lo_export()(Bruce)
Fix unitialized reads of memory(Kurt)
Fixed ALTER TABLE ... char(3) bug(Bruce)
Fixed a few small memory leaks
Fixed EXPLAIN handling of options and changed full_path option name
Fixed output of group acl permissions
Memory leaks (hunt and destroy with tools like Purify(Kurt)
Minor improvements to rules system
NOTIFY fixes
New asserts for run-checking
Overhauled parser/analyze code to properly report errors and increase speed
Pg_dump -d now handles NULL's properly(Bruce)
Prevent SELECT NULL from crashing server (Bruce)
Properly report errors when INSERT ... SELECT columns did not match
Properly report errors when insert column names were not correct
Psql \g filename now works(Bruce)
Psql fixed problem with multiple statements on one line with multiple outputs
Removed duplicate system oid's
SELECT * INTO TABLE . GROUP/ORDER BY gives unlink error if table exists(Bruce)
Several fixes for queries that crashed the backend
Starting quote in insert string errors(Bruce)
Submitting an empty query now returns empty status, not just " " query(Bruce)

Enhancements
------------
Add EXPLAIN manual page(Bruce)
Add UNIQUE index capability(Dan)
Add hostname/user level access control rather than just hostname and user
Add synonym of != for (Bruce)
Allow "select oid,* from table"
Allow BY,ORDER BY to specify columns by number, or by non-alias table.column(Bruce)
Allow COPY from the frontend(Bryan)
Allow GROUP BY to use alias column name(Bruce)
Allow actual compression, not just reuse on the same page(Vadim)
Allow installation-configuration option to auto-add all local users(Bryan)
Allow libpq to distinguish between text value '' and null(Bruce)
Allow non-postgres users with createdb privs to destroydb's
Allow restriction on who can create C functions(Bryan)
Allow restriction on who can do backend COPY(Bryan)
Can shrink tables, pg_time and pg_log(Vadim & Erich)
Change debug level 2 to print queries only, changed debug heading layout(Bruce)
Change default decimal constant representation from float4 to float8(Bruce)
European date format now set when postmaster is started
Execute lowercase function names if not found with exact case
Fixes for aggregate/GROUP processing, allow 'select sum(func(x),sum(x+y) from z'
Gist now included in the distrubution(Marc)
Idend authentication of local users(Bryan)
Implement BETWEEN qualifier(Bruce)
Implement IN qualifier(Bruce)
Libpq has PQgetisnull()(Bruce)
Libpq++ improvements
New options to initdb(Bryan)
Pg_dump allow dump of oid's(Bruce)
Pg_dump create indexes after tables are loaded for speed(Bruce)
Pg_dumpall dumps all databases, and the user table
Pginterface additions for NULL values(Bruce)
Prevent postmaster from being run as root
Psql \h and \? is now readable(Bruce)
Psql allow backslashed, semicolons anywhere on the line(Bruce)
Psql changed command prompt for lines in query or in quotes(Bruce)
Psql char(3) now displays as (bp)char in \d output(Bruce)
Psql return code now more accurate(Bryan?)
Psql updated help syntax(Bruce)
Re-visit and fix vacuum(Vadim)
Reduce size of regression diffs, remove timezone name difference(Bruce)
Remove compile-time parameters to enable binary distributions(Bryan)
Reverse meaning of HBA masks(Bryan)
Secure Authentication of local users(Bryan)
Speed up vacuum(Vadim)
Vacuum now had VERBOSE option(Bruce)

Source tree changes
-------------------
All functions now have prototypes that are compared against the calls
Allow asserts to be disabled easly from Makefile.global(Bruce)
Change oid constants used in code to #define names
Decoupled sparc and solaris defines(Kurt)
Gcc -Wall compiles cleanly with warnings only from unfixable constructs
Major include file reorganization/reduction(Marc)
Make now stops on compile failure(Bryan)
Makefile restructuring(Bryan, Marc)
Merge bsdi_2_1 to bsdi(Bruce)
Monitor program removed
Name change from Postgres95 to PostgreSQL
New config.h file(Marc, Bryan)
PG_VERSION now set to 6.0 and used by postmaster
Portability additions, including Ultrix, DG/UX, AIX, and Solaris
Reduced the number of #define's, centeralized #define's
Remove duplicate OIDS in system tables(Dan)
Remove duplicate system catalog info or report mismatches(Dan)
Removed many os-specific #define's
Restructured object file generation/location(Bryan, Marc)
Restructured port-specific file locations(Bryan, Marc)
Unused/uninialized variables corrected


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                Release v1.09
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release v1.09

Sorry, we stopped keeping track of changes from 1.02 to 1.09. Some of the
changes listed in 6.0 were actually included in the 1.02.1 to 1.09 releases.

  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
Release v6.0                                                   Release v1.02
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release v1.02

Migration from v1.02 to v1.02.1

Here is a new migration file for 1.02.1. It includes the 'copy' change and a
script to convert old ascii files.

     Note: The following notes are for the benefit of users who want to
     migrate databases from postgres95 1.01 and 1.02 to postgres95
     1.02.1.

     If you are starting afresh with postgres95 1.02.1 and do not need
     to migrate old databases, you do not need to read any further.

In order to upgrade older postgres95 version 1.01 or 1.02 databases to
version 1.02.1, the following steps are required:

  1. Start up a new 1.02.1 postmaster

  2. Add the new built-in functions and operators of 1.02.1 to 1.01 or 1.02
     databases. This is done by running the new 1.02.1 server against your
     own 1.01 or 1.02 database and applying the queries attached at the end
     of thie file. This can be done easily through psql. If your 1.01 or
     1.02 database is named "testdb" and you have cut the commands from the
     end of this file and saved them in addfunc.sql:

             % psql testdb -f addfunc.sql

     Those upgrading 1.02 databases will get a warning when executing the
     last two statements in the file because they are already present in
     1.02. This is not a cause for concern.

Dump/Reload Procedure

If you are trying to reload a pg_dump or text-mode 'copy tablename to
stdout' generated with a previous version, you will need to run the attached
sed script on the ASCII file before loading it into the database. The old
format used '.' as end-of-data, while '\.' is now the end-of-data marker.
Also, empty strings are now loaded in as '' rather than NULL. See the copy
manual page for full details.

        sed 's/^\.$/\\./g' in_file out_file

If you are loading an older binary copy or non-stdout copy, there is no
end-of-data character, and hence no conversion necessary.

-- following lines added by agc to reflect the case-insensitive
-- regexp searching for varchar (in 1.02), and bpchar (in 1.02.1)
create operator ~* (leftarg = bpchar, rightarg = text, procedure = texticregexeq);
create operator !~* (leftarg = bpchar, rightarg = text, procedure = texticregexne);
create operator ~* (leftarg = varchar, rightarg = text, procedure = texticregexeq);
create operator !~* (leftarg = varchar, rightarg = text, procedure = texticregexne);

Detailed Change List

Source code maintenance and development
 * worldwide team of volunteers
 * the source tree now in CVS at ftp.ki.net

Enhancements
 * psql (and underlying libpq library) now has many more options for
   formatting output, including HTML
 * pg_dump now output the schema and/or the data, with many fixes to
   enhance completeness.
 * psql used in place of monitor in administration shell scripts.
   monitor to be depreciated in next release.
 * date/time functions enhanced
 * NULL insert/update/comparison fixed/enhanced
 * TCL/TK lib and shell fixed to work with both tck7.4/tk4.0 and tcl7.5/tk4.1

Bug Fixes (almost too numerous to mention)
 * indexes
 * storage management
 * check for NULL pointer before dereferencing
 * Makefile fixes

New Ports
 * added SolarisX86 port
 * added BSDI 2.1 port
 * added DGUX port


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                 Release v1.01
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release v1.01

Migration from v1.0 to v1.01

The following notes are for the benefit of users who want to migrate
databases from postgres95 1.0 to postgres95 1.01.

If you are starting afresh with postgres95 1.01 and do not need to migrate
old databases, you do not need to read any further.

In order to postgres95 version 1.01 with databases created with postgres95
version 1.0, the following steps are required:

  1. Set the definition of NAMEDATALEN in src/Makefile.global to 16 and
     OIDNAMELEN to 20.

  2. Decide whether you want to use Host based authentication.

       a. If you do, you must create a file name "pg_hba" in your top-level
          data directory (typically the value of your $PGDATA).
          src/libpq/pg_hba shows an example syntax.

       b. If you do not want host-based authentication, you can comment out
          the line

                  HBA = 1

          in src/Makefile.global

          Note that host-based authentication is turned on by default, and
          if you do not take steps A or B above, the out-of-the-box 1.01
          will not allow you to connect to 1.0 databases.

  3. Compile and install 1.01, but DO NOT do the initdb step.

  4. Before doing anything else, terminate your 1.0 postmaster, and backup
     your existing $PGDATA directory.

  5. Set your PGDATA environment variable to your 1.0 databases, but set up
     path up so that 1.01 binaries are being used.

  6. Modify the file $PGDATA/PG_VERSION from 5.0 to 5.1

  7. Start up a new 1.01 postmaster

  8. Add the new built-in functions and operators of 1.01 to 1.0 databases.
     This is done by running the new 1.01 server against your own 1.0
     database and applying the queries attached and saving in the file
     1.0_to_1.01.sql. This can be done easily through psql. If your 1.0
     database is name "testdb":

             % psql testdb -f 1.0_to_1.01.sql

     and then execute the following commands (cut and paste from here):

     -- add builtin functions that are new to 1.01

     create function int4eqoid (int4, oid) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function oideqint4 (oid, int4) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function char2icregexeq (char2, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function char2icregexne (char2, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function char4icregexeq (char4, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function char4icregexne (char4, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function char8icregexeq (char8, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function char8icregexne (char8, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function char16icregexeq (char16, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function char16icregexne (char16, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function texticregexeq (text, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';
     create function texticregexne (text, text) returns bool as 'foo'
     language 'internal';

     -- add builtin functions that are new to 1.01

     create operator = (leftarg = int4, rightarg = oid, procedure = int4eqoid);
     create operator = (leftarg = oid, rightarg = int4, procedure = oideqint4);
     create operator ~* (leftarg = char2, rightarg = text, procedure = char2icregexeq);
     create operator !~* (leftarg = char2, rightarg = text, procedure = char2icregexne);
     create operator ~* (leftarg = char4, rightarg = text, procedure = char4icregexeq);
     create operator !~* (leftarg = char4, rightarg = text, procedure = char4icregexne);
     create operator ~* (leftarg = char8, rightarg = text, procedure = char8icregexeq);
     create operator !~* (leftarg = char8, rightarg = text, procedure = char8icregexne);
     create operator ~* (leftarg = char16, rightarg = text, procedure = char16icregexeq);
     create operator !~* (leftarg = char16, rightarg = text, procedure = char16icregexne);
     create operator ~* (leftarg = text, rightarg = text, procedure = texticregexeq);
     create operator !~* (leftarg = text, rightarg = text, procedure = texticregexne);

Detailed Change List

Incompatibilities:
 * 1.01 is backwards compatible with 1.0 database provided the user
   follow the steps outlined in the MIGRATION_from_1.0_to_1.01 file.
   If those steps are not taken, 1.01 is not compatible with 1.0 database.

Enhancements:
 * added PQdisplayTuples() to libpq and changed monitor and psql to use it
 * added NeXT port (requires SysVIPC implementation)
 * added CAST .. AS ... syntax
 * added ASC and DESC keywords
 * added 'internal' as a possible language for CREATE FUNCTION
   internal functions are C functions which have been statically linked
   into the postgres backend.
 * a new type "name" has been added for system identifiers (table names,
   attribute names, etc.)  This replaces the old char16 type.   The
   of name is set by the NAMEDATALEN #define in src/Makefile.global
 * a readable reference manual that describes the query language.
 * added host-based access control.  A configuration file ($PGDATA/pg_hba)
   is used to hold the configuration data.  If host-based access control
   is not desired, comment out HBA=1 in src/Makefile.global.
 * changed regex handling to be uniform use of Henry Spencer's regex code
   regardless of platform.  The regex code is included in the distribution
 * added functions and operators for case-insensitive regular expressions.
   The operators are ~* and !~*.
 * pg_dump uses COPY instead of SELECT loop for better performance

Bug fixes:
 * fixed an optimizer bug that was causing core dumps when
   functions calls were used in comparisons in the WHERE clause
 * changed all uses of getuid to geteuid so that effective uids are used
 * psql now returns non-zero status on errors when using -c
 * applied public patches 1-14


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                 Release v1.0
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Release v1.0

Detailed Change List

Copyright change:
 * The copyright of Postgres 1.0 has been loosened to be freely modifiable
   and modifiable for any purpose.  Please read the COPYRIGHT file.
   Thanks to Professor Michael Stonebraker for making this possible.

Incompatibilities:
 *  date formats have to be MM-DD-YYYY (or DD-MM-YYYY if you're using
   EUROPEAN STYLE).  This follows SQL-92 specs.
 *  "delimiters" is now a keyword

Enhancements:
 *  sql LIKE syntax has been added
 *  copy command now takes an optional USING DELIMITER specification.
   delimiters can be any single-character string.
 *  IRIX 5.3 port has been added.
   Thanks to Paul Walmsley and others.
 *  updated pg_dump to work with new libpq
 *  \d has been added psql
   Thanks to Keith Parks
 *  regexp performance for architectures that use POSIX regex has been
   improved due to caching of precompiled patterns.
   Thanks to Alistair Crooks
 *  a new version of libpq++
   Thanks to William Wanders

Bug fixes:
 *  arbitrary userids can be specified in the createuser script
 *  \c to connect to other databases in psql now works.
 *  bad pg_proc entry for float4inc() is fixed
 *  users with usecreatedb field set can now create databases without
   having to be usesuper
 *  remove access control entries when the entry no longer has any
   permissions
 *  fixed non-portable datetimes implementation
 *  added kerberos flags to the src/backend/Makefile
 *  libpq now works with kerberos
 *  typographic errors in the user manual have been corrected.
 *  btrees with multiple index never worked, now we tell you they don't
   work when you try to use them


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                           Postgres95 Beta 0.03
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Postgres95 Beta 0.03

Detailed Change List

Incompatible changes:
 * BETA-0.3 IS INCOMPATIBLE WITH DATABASES CREATED WITH PREVIOUS VERSIONS
   (due to system catalog changes and indexing structure changes).
 * double-quote (") is deprecated as a quoting character for string literals;
   you need to convert them to single quotes (').
 * name of aggregates (eg. int4sum) are renamed in accordance with the
   SQL standard (eg. sum).
 * CHANGE ACL syntax is replaced by GRANT/REVOKE syntax.
 * float literals (eg. 3.14) are now of type float4 (instead of float8 in
   previous releases); you might have to do typecasting if you depend on it
   being of type float8.  If you neglect to do the typecasting and you assign
   a float literal to a field of type float8, you may get incorrect values
   stored!
 * LIBPQ has been totally revamped so that frontend applications
   can connect to multiple backends
 * the usesysid field in pg_user has been changed from int2 to int4 to
   allow wider range of Unix user ids.
 * the netbsd/freebsd/bsd o/s ports have been consolidated into a
   single BSD44_derived port.  (thanks to Alistair Crooks)

SQL standard-compliance (the following details changes that makes postgres95
more compliant to the SQL-92 standard):
 * the following SQL types are now built-in: smallint, int(eger), float, real,
   char(N), varchar(N), date and time.

   The following are aliases to existing postgres types:
                smallint -> int2
                integer, int -> int4
                float, real  -> float4
   char(N) and varchar(N) are implemented as truncated text types. In
   addition, char(N) does blank-padding.
 * single-quote (') is used for quoting string literals; '' (in addition to
   \') is supported as means of inserting a single quote in a string
 * SQL standard aggregate names (MAX, MIN, AVG, SUM, COUNT) are used
   (Also, aggregates can now be overloaded, i.e. you can define your
   own MAX aggregate to take in a user-defined type.)
 * CHANGE ACL removed. GRANT/REVOKE syntax added.
   - Privileges can be given to a group using the "GROUP" keyword.
        For example:
                GRANT SELECT ON foobar TO GROUP my_group;
        The keyword 'PUBLIC' is also supported to mean all users.

        Privileges can only be granted or revoked to one user or group
        at a time.

        "WITH GRANT OPTION" is not supported.  Only class owners can change
        access control
   - The default access control is to to grant users readonly access.
     You must explicitly grant insert/update access to users.  To change
     this, modify the line in
                src/backend/utils/acl.h
     that defines ACL_WORLD_DEFAULT

Bug fixes:
 * the bug where aggregates of empty tables were not run has been fixed. Now,
   aggregates run on empty tables will return the initial conditions of the
   aggregates. Thus, COUNT of an empty  table will now properly return 0.
   MAX/MIN of an empty table will return a tuple of value NULL.
 * allow the use of \; inside the monitor
 * the LISTEN/NOTIFY asynchronous notification mechanism now work
 * NOTIFY in rule action bodies now work
 * hash indices work, and access methods in general should perform better.
   creation of large btree indices should be much faster.  (thanks to Paul
   Aoki)

Other changes and enhancements:
 * addition of an EXPLAIN statement used for explaining the query execution
   plan (eg. "EXPLAIN SELECT * FROM EMP" prints out the execution plan for
   the query).
 * WARN and NOTICE messages no longer have timestamps on them. To turn on
   timestamps of error messages, uncomment the line in
   src/backend/utils/elog.h:
        /* define ELOG_TIMESTAMPS */
 * On an access control violation, the message
        "Either no such class or insufficient privilege"
   will be given.  This is the same message that is returned when
   a class is not found.  This dissuades non-privileged users from
   guessing the existence of privileged classes.
 * some additional system catalog changes have been made that are not
   visible to the user.

libpgtcl changes:
 * The -oid option has been added to the "pg_result" tcl command.
   pg_result -oid returns oid of the last tuple inserted.   If the
   last command was not an INSERT, then pg_result -oid returns "".
 * the large object interface is available as pg_lo* tcl commands:
   pg_lo_open, pg_lo_close, pg_lo_creat, etc.

Portability enhancements and New Ports:
 * flex/lex problems have been cleared up.  Now, you should be able to use
   flex instead of lex on any platforms.  We no longer make assumptions of
   what lexer you use based on the platform you use.
 * The Linux-ELF port is now supported.  Various configuration have been
   tested:  The following configuration is known to work:
        kernel 1.2.10, gcc 2.6.3, libc 4.7.2, flex 2.5.2, bison 1.24
   with everything in ELF format,

New utilities:
 * ipcclean added to the distribution
   ipcclean usually does not need to be run, but if your backend crashes
   and leaves shared memory segments hanging around, ipcclean will
   clean them up for you.

New documentation:
 * the user manual has been revised and libpq documentation added.


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                          Postgres95 Beta 0.02
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Postgres95 Beta 0.02

Detailed Change List

Incompatible changes:
 * The SQL statement for creating a database is 'CREATE DATABASE' instead
   of 'CREATEDB'. Similarly, dropping a database is 'DROP DATABASE' instead
   of 'DESTROYDB'. However, the names of the executables 'createdb' and
   'destroydb' remain the same.

New tools:
 * pgperl - a Perl (4.036) interface to Postgres95
 * pg_dump - a utility for dumping out a postgres database into a
        script file containing query commands. The script files are in a ASCII
        format and can be used to reconstruct the database, even on other
        machines and other architectures. (Also good for converting
        a Postgres 4.2 database to Postgres95 database.)

The following ports have been incorporated into postgres95-beta-0.02:
 * the NetBSD port by Alistair Crooks
 * the AIX port by Mike Tung
 * the Windows NT port by Jon Forrest (more stuff but not done yet)
 * the Linux ELF port by Brian Gallew

The following bugs have been fixed in postgres95-beta-0.02:
 * new lines not escaped in COPY OUT and problem with COPY OUT when first
   attribute is a '.'
 * cannot type return to use the default user id in createuser
 * SELECT DISTINCT on big tables crashes
 * Linux installation problems
 * monitor doesn't allow use of 'localhost' as PGHOST
 * psql core dumps when doing \c or \l
 * the "pgtclsh" target missing from src/bin/pgtclsh/Makefile
 * libpgtcl has a hard-wired default port number
 * SELECT DISTINCT INTO TABLE hangs
 * CREATE TYPE doesn't accept 'variable' as the internallength
 * wrong result using more than 1 aggregate in a SELECT

  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                          Postgres95 Beta 0.01
                                Release Notes
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Postgres95 Beta 0.01

Initial release.


  ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                Timing Results
                                Release Notes
Prev
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

Timing Results

These timing results are from running the regression test with the commands

% cd src/test/regress
% make all
% time make runtest


Timing under Linux 2.0.27 seems to have a roughly 5% variation from run to
run, presumably due to the scheduling vagaries of multitasking systems.

v6.5

As has been the case for previous releases, timing between releases is not
directly comparable since new regression tests have been added. In general,
v6.5 is faster than previous releases.

Timing with fsync() disabled:

  Time   System
  02:00  Dual Pentium Pro 180, 224MB, UW-SCSI, Linux 2.0.36, gcc 2.7.2.3 -O2 -m486
  04:38  Sparc Ultra 1 143MHz, 64MB, Solaris 2.6


Timing with fsync() enabled:

  Time   System
  04:21  Dual Pentium Pro 180, 224MB, UW-SCSI, Linux 2.0.36, gcc 2.7.2.3 -O2 -m486


For the linux system above, using UW-SCSI disks rather than (older) IDE
disks leads to a 50% improvement in speed on the regression test.

v6.4beta

The times for this release are not directly comparable to those for previous
releases since some additional regression tests have been included. In
general, however, v6.4 should be slightly faster than the previous release
(thanks, Bruce!).

  Time   System
  02:26  Dual Pentium Pro 180, 96MB, UW-SCSI, Linux 2.0.30, gcc 2.7.2.1 -O2 -m486

v6.3

The times for this release are not directly comparable to those for previous
releases since some additional regression tests have been included and some
obsolete tests involving time travel have been removed. In general, however,
v6.3 is substantially faster than previous releases (thanks, Bruce!).

  Time   System
  02:30  Dual Pentium Pro 180, 96MB, UW-SCSI, Linux 2.0.30, gcc 2.7.2.1 -O2 -m486
  04:12  Dual Pentium Pro 180, 96MB, EIDE, Linux 2.0.30, gcc 2.7.2.1 -O2 -m486

v6.1

  Time   System
  06:12  Pentium Pro 180, 32MB, EIDE, Linux 2.0.30, gcc 2.7.2 -O2 -m486
  12:06  P-100, 48MB, Linux 2.0.29, gcc
  39:58  Sparc IPC 32MB, Solaris 2.5, gcc 2.7.2.1 -O -g
